"To use a little fashion analogy, there is no time-lag in fashion." Zambia, the second-largest economy in sub-Saharan Africa, was thrown into turmoil over a week ago when President Edgar Lungu said the president should no longer be allowed to die in his bed. Speaking after Edgar Lungu's death was announced, the nation's Chief Justice and Supreme Court officials served the death notice from the gates of his Shilo home. Lungu's death certificate states he died from "high blood pressure" after suffering a stroke. Lungu's office is now appealing the death notice's legality and says Lungu's family has been given seven days to decide what to do with the urn containing his remains. The imam who performed the funeral prayers for Lungu told local media "we didn't even get a chance to say goodbye". Carlos Mojica, a Democratic Republic of Congo-based filmmaker, came under threat from "some big people" when he tweeted his condolences for Lungu, who has been president since 2013. The tweet has since been deleted and with independence this week marked 150 years since Napoleon Bonaparte launched his troops on the DRC in an attempt to control the Congo. "How far have we come, 200 years later, still being insulted and humiliated in our own country?" said Mojica. "I'm sure there are those in their own dreams, saying 'that was me and now I'm done'." Geldof, who campaigned to bring aid to famine-struck Somalia after the 1998-2000 civil war there, says the Ebola crisis is being affected by a worldwide malaise. "We have seen in the history of disasters, whether it's World War Two, Katrina, the volcanic ash cloud, and floods as well," Geldof told Foster. "As the story goes, a great car had a great problem and couldn't drive through a wall. It always connotes something is wrong." "I suppose this is the beginning of a very important rethink of how we deal with these things, how we're going to support and help them cope with this and how we can spread a globally positive agenda, in that we have to stop this worrying 'Nairobi-style' capitalism, and global elite." Geldof said he hoped to appeal to world leaders, and to make sure they "do their jobs and get this right". While it is too early to know whether the Ebola outbreak is "over" in the three countries most affected, the reaction to the first new cases in Guinea, Liberia and Sierra Leone this year have suggested the crisis is maturing. The response has been the largest ever to Ebola, with a "full response" by the World Health Organization, including $337 million in donations from donors. However, the response, including the established "ring vaccination" to ensure the virus doesn't spread to people
.. intervene quite radically and effectively and immediately." Since the outbreak started in March, about 9,000 Ebola cases and 4,493 deaths have been reported, mostly in Guinea, Liberia and Sierra Leone, according to the World Health Organization. The WHO has warned there could be up to 10,000 new Ebola cases per week across the three hardest-hit nations by the end of the year. Geldof, the musician responsible for coordinating Live Aid concerts to draw attention to famine in Africa in the 1980s, said people starved then because they couldn't grow food and they and their governments had no money to buy any. "In effect they died of poverty. "The same is happening now in West Africa. They don't have the doctors, nurses, hospitals, state systems that they have in Texas or Madrid and so once again, through no fault of their own, this virus is out of control in states where there are no systems -- because there is no money," he said. In Sierra Leone, one of the nations worst-hit by Ebola, the situation was "particularly tragic," he said. "Sierra Leone was just getting off its knees, beginning to breathe, the economy was beginning to have traction and people were beginning to get well educated, hospitals were being built," Geldof said. "You could be looking at -- some people think -- some sort of state collapse, which would be utterly unthinkable because the disease itself, should that happen, would then spiral away by itself." But Geldof was hopeful the spread of the virus could be halted. "With the right will, the right level of commitment, this can be contained. The issue is, will it be contained in time to stop these states collapsing and then other evils -- human evils -- emanating from that," he said. "I've been briefed on what the response is and should all of it happen then I think it's plausible. But it has to happen immediately, it has to happen now. It's now beyond getting together and having a summit. It's now calling up the various leaders and saying 'now, do it now, mobilize this thing instantly and proactively." The medical organization Medicines San Frontieres -- or Doctors Without Borders -- had warned six months ago of the Ebola threat to the world and "we should have put a stop to it then," he said. An effective response, however, depended on more than "just the usual suspects" of Western Europe and the United States getting involved, said Geldof. "It should be in the interest to the Chinese and the Japanese and the Russians to contribute to this and we hear very little from them and we should hear more."
History's first airplane-powered flight is now seen as a bit of a close call.According to latest research that is being heralded as revalidating the Wright brothers' claim that they made the first powered powered flight in 1903.A new photo seems to show a more traveled man, better-known in history as Gustave Whitehead, flying around England -- it is two or three weeks before Charles Albert Wright (sans engine), and Wilbur A. Wright (sans engine) made the first successful controlled flight in the world, says a Smithsonian Air and Space Museum spokesman.John Brown, author of "Piloting the Air, Extra Ordinary Witnesses" (Atheneum, 2010), finds Whitehead flying around France and England. He says more commonly known as Whitehead, he completed two flights, free falling before landing, and flying again just after -- but he is the one who flew on his own power.Brown said in an interview that aviation historians accepted it was the Wright brothers' flight until fairly recently -- until his book was published. Experts knew where both pioneers landed; others thought that was pretty well covered.Brown said he believes the picture shows what happened on the third flight by Whitehead."If Wilbur had landed, it would have been safe; he could have walked away from that plane without injury," Brown said. "But it didn't."So why the fuss? History. By a very thin margin, the Wright brothers claimed to have made the first unassisted powered flight, along with their homemade machine which had propellers.Before flight historian Whitehead was shown his picture by Brown, he couldn't be convinced the Wright brothers had made the first flight, either, and consulted Mr. "They made it!" Charles Shields.Shields is the same aviator who famously, and controversially, said, "Don't believe those guys," after watching the Wright brothers in Dayton, Ohio, during a public address in March 1903.Shields believed they were wrong. The Wright brothers said there was no proof they had been involved in flight. Brown's research indicates that Whitehead took that chance.History isn't the only thing who wants to know who flew first.Mr. "We made it!" Ferdous, a native of Iran, is a big supporter of the Wright brothers. But Brown is not even a Wright-backer.He asks, "Did the Wright brothers make the first human powered flight?" He says, "No."This week, a new effort to find out the answer won a key win: The Connecticut General Assembly approved a resolution officially joining the efforts of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration and the University of Texas at Austin to prove or debunk the Wright brothers' claim.McPherson says an interesting bill, sponsored by former astronaut Scott Glenn of New London, who is now a Connecticut congressman, would establish state approval of Wright v. Whitehead flights and their area of competence. That could prevent situations like, "No, it didn't really happen -- it was not a powered flight."Congress is expected to finish its authorization of NASA's budget by next Tuesday, so Congress will vote on the resolution, possibly by the end of the year. -- WGBH .
president: George Washington. First human to walk on the moon: Neil Armstrong. First to achieve powered flight: Orville and Wilbur Wright. Wrong. At least that's what Connecticut says. State lawmakers passed a bill this week to honor Gustave Whitehead, who they claim beat the Wrights by two years. Gustave who? Whitehead. According to a 1901 Connecticut newspaper account, Whitehead -- a German immigrant -- flew his aircraft 150 feet in the air for about a half mile over the city of Bridgeport. The claim has been backed up by a respected aviation reference guide. The debate has got the Smithsonian's longtime aviation historian frustrated and worried. It also has triggered conspiratorial accusations about a "secret agreement" between the revered museum and the Wright brothers. Let's pause to remember that, hey, these guys are worldwide heroes. The image of their two-winged plane has appeared on U.S. money. On postage stamps, too. Kitty Hawk, North Carolina, where the Wrights flew, stands as a popular national landmark. It generates untold tourism dollars for a state that has labeled its car license tags with the words, "First in Flight." These are more than just bragging rights. A lot is at stake. This is a big deal. "There is no legitimacy to the claim," says Tom Crouch, the Smithsonian's aviation historian. "Justice is at risk. Credit should go where credit is deserved." Not long after Whitehead's alleged flight, Crouch says, experts tried to find witnesses quoted in the Connecticut newspaper's account. Only one of two named witnesses could be found, says Crouch, and that witness said the flight never happened. If Whitehead really was first to fly, Crouch asks, "why didn't he repeat it later? Did he forget the secret of flight? Then he started building machines based on other people's designs. Why would he do that if his own inventions were successful?" Ever since Whitehead's flight, Crouch says "absolutely everyone has rejected those claims. No one accepted them." Until now. "Jane's All the World's Aircraft," a respected aviation reference guide, has endorsed the claim. Also, Australian aviation historian John Brown says he found key photographic evidence. Last March, while rummaging through a museum attic in Germany, Brown says he found a lost photo that may depict the plane in flight. "It was quite an emotional moment for me. I just jumped up in the air screaming," Brown says when experts confirmed that the photo was authentic. But does the photo show the plane in flight? "It's just a blotch," says Crouch, describing the blurry image. "It's not an airplane." Brown agrees that the blurry image fails to offer definitive proof. But rather than trying to prove what the photograph shows or doesn't show, Brown has been focusing on establishing the credibility of journalists and witness reports from the 1901 flight. Journalists in the 1930s and afterward interviewed 17 witnesses who said they saw Whitehead flying, Brown says. The stories by 14 of those witnesses were notarized. Based on his research, Brown believes Whitehead did indeed fly before the Wrights.
The most damaging tornado on record struck this spring in Joplin, Missouri, killing 161. The strongest tornado to hit in a single season was in Oklahoma City in 2011, killing 24. Tornadoes in the U.S. so far this year have killed more than 489 people, according to tornado fatalities data that the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration provided to CNN. That total exceeds the deaths from all other tornado-related fatalities in the past three decades. The deadliest tornado on record is 1925, which had 794 deaths . The strongest tornado to hit in a single season was in Oklahoma City in 2011, killing 24. The death toll from tornado-related fatalities from all ages is 335, according to NOAA data. The-CNN-Wire ™ & © 2014 Cable News Network, Inc., a Time Warner Company. All rights reserved.
Tuesday, the death toll in Joplin had reached 124, making it the single deadliest tornado since the National Weather Service began keeping such records 61 years ago. The tornado in Joplin brought the number of people who have died in U.S. tornadoes to 489 so far this year. The figure could escalate as rescue workers continue digging through rubble from Sunday's tornado in Joplin, Missouri. The deadliest tornado year on record is 1925, which had 794 deaths, according to the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration. The number of fatalities so far this year is more than 8 1/2 times the average number for an entire year -- 56, according to CNN meteorologist Chad Myers. With all the advancements in storm technology, the question is simple: Why? "That's the question of 2011," said Bob Henson of the University Corporation for Atmospheric Research.
You probably feel like the Big G's decision to open source Android has resulted in a more competitive mobile ecosystem (for now). However, there's one area where the Big G is failing to fully support its mobile users: web video. As the Web has evolved, video has exploded in popularity (not that you'll hear Google talk about it publicly). For several years, Google was the dominant player in the web video space, but it failed to keep up with the pace of change by continually giving its competitors the upper hand. Fortunately, the situation has changed for the better in recent months -- mostly because of the efforts of Mozilla (which now owns the video player and playback app formerly known as the VLC player) and the open and neutral technology community under the umbrella of H.264. The days of Google tripping over itself to take all the credit and collect all the money from web video are over. While there are no guarantees that Google's video technology will keep pace with the exponential growth of mobile video consumption, for now it looks like things are headed in the right direction.H.264 is a non-proprietary, multiparty standard adopted by over 160 device makers including Apple, Android, Windows Phone, Windows, and more -- and while it is open to all of these companies, H.264's use of proprietary technology is arguably Google's biggest Achilles' heel. In fact, that's why we published this article in the first place: To point out just how hypocritical Google is when it comes to mobile video. A few years ago, we looked at the prevalence of H.264 on Android phones. We found that only one non-Google app, VLC, was running natively -- and its vide player was proprietary. Thankfully, things have gotten a lot better, and the latest version of H.264 (v5.0) makes H.264 open-source, enabling companies to develop more custom solutions for their own end users.The biggest improvement is around privacy and permissions -- which can be one and the same thing for web video, which is constantly rewiring itself around the content that you are watching. Typically, an app needs to access a user's content if you allow it to. However, if you don't turn it on, you get rid of the whole app. If you don't have
And, anyway, "open" isn't necessarily better. For example, Google especially loves to boast that its Android software for phones and tablets is "open." You'd think that means that anyone would have control over their phones, to install all the apps they want, change the way it looks, and update to the latest version of Android. But that's not what it means. It really means that Google's close partners -- mobile operators and phone manufacturers, but not consumers -- can chop up Android to their liking. That's why many new Android phones ship with pre-installed "crapware" apps. It's why some have shortcomings, like the inability to install apps that aren't from Google's official app market. And it's why most Android owners have to wait a long time for Android software updates -- if the updates are ever made available for their specific phones. Meanwhile, despite all the talk about Android being "open," there are even some things that Google's huge Android partners can't change. For example, when Motorola wanted to swap out Google's built-in location services on its Android phones for a competing service from a startup called Skyhook Wireless, Google effectively forced them to stop, according to a lawsuit that Skyhook filed against Google. What's "open" about allegedly forcing your partners to use Google's tools and guidelines instead of competing tools? Android is just one example. Google has recently been inconsistent about its definition of "open" when it comes to web video technology, too. And if Google were really serious about being "open," they'd share their search and advertising algorithms with the world. Now that would be "open." But of course Google would never do that -- that's proprietary information that can't fall into the hands of competitors. Google has every incentive to keep its core business information "closed," and it will likely continue to. The more we look, the more we see that "open" Google is really more like "open when convenient or favorable to Google." This is perfectly fine: Google is a for-profit company and can do whatever it wants. But anyone who thinks its actions are transparent or truly "open" is pretending. The opinions expressed in this commentary are solely those of Dan Frommer. Copyright © 2010 Business Insider.
What made it so worthwhile was I spent much of my school day with intelligent, funny, compassionate people who had dreams of pursuing their talents. Miami is the mecca of alchemy. The fruits of its labor live all around the world. The Starbucks on Atlantic Avenue, the tech industry in South Florida, the Black & Decker manufacturing work force and the constant innovations that arise from their labs and laboratories all reflect their labor. What set my alchemy apart from theirs was that my alchemy would turn into a positive by the end of each year. In its sweetest form, the alchemy of my students made me happy, which in turn made me mean, which in turn made me deeply invested in their success and happiness. Before my diagnosis, I'd already been subjected to the rigors of teaching. For the first half of my career, I worked from 9 a.m. to 9 p.m. in a free-standing store selling books to students interested in creating their own fiction. Other than that routine, it was a graveyard shift, and there was no rest until our late night tutoring shifts. When I was training for teaching, I spent my first week at the Metropolitan Museum of Art in New York, asking questions and studying how ancient societies based their societies and societies around them. I knew I wanted to find order in the chaos of the frenetic world around me. Through the timeless vistas of the museum, I identified an ideal location for my school in which I could make my classroom and all of my students present. I called my school "The Noble Circus." While we were raising money for our renovation and implementation project, we would visit the zoo, fairs, and benefit concerts. I connected with renowned artists and educators, and changed the way I approached teaching. I took the time to find out what made their classes unique. I always felt a special energy at my students' schools. During an epic night at Merriweather Post Pavilion, my students played their original songs on 12-string guitars and combined styles of jazz, rock and metal to create a blend of styles that showcased their intellect. It was the Beatles to the Black Keys, in a performance that highlighted their musical prowess but also showcased the brilliant minds and critical thinking skills of these young people. That night, some of my students put it best: "Going from the paper bag to the conference, David Menasche says: 'I'm not ready for this yet ...' And we still have time." They're young, they're bright, they want to explore and conquer, to make this world a better place. I hope they do.
Nothing made me happier or more content than standing in front of a classroom and sharing the works of writers such as Shakespeare, Chaucer, Jack Kerouac, Tupac Shakur and Gwendolyn Brooks and watching my students "catch" my passion for language and literature. I loved watching these 15- and 16-year-olds grapple with their first major life decisions -- future careers, relationships, where to live, which colleges to attend, what to study-- at the same moment they're learning to drive and getting their first jobs and experimenting with identity and independence. There wasn't a day when I didn't feel privileged to be part of their metamorphoses and grateful for the chance to affect their lives. My classroom was my sanctuary, so on the day before Thanksgiving in 2006 when I was diagnosed with an incurable form of brain cancer at 34 and told I had less than a year to live, I did what I always did. I went to school. I needed my students to know that I trusted them enough to share life's most sacrosanct passage. Death. They, in turn, helped me to live in the moment and spend whatever time I had left living well. For six years, the only time I wasn't in class was when I was undergoing brain surgery. I never avoided the topic of my cancer, glioblastoma multiforme, with my students, but it was not something I dwelled on, nor did they. I covered my bald, lacerated head with a woolen hat and scheduled chemotherapy around my classes, and I got so good at being sick that I could run to the bathroom, heave into the toilet, flush, brush my teeth and fly back to class in under three minutes. They pretended not to notice. During that time, I even won "Teacher of the Year" for my region. I was grateful for every breath and felt as if I could live that way forever. Then, two summers ago, the tumor in my head decided to act up. I was playing pool with a friend when I was struck with a catastrophic seizure that left me crippled and mostly blind. After two months of physical therapy and a grim prognosis for improvement, I was forced to face that I could no longer be the teacher I once was and I tendered my resignation. The cancer had finally succeeded in taking me out of the classroom, but I wasn't ready to let it take me out of the game. I wasn't afraid to die. I was afraid of living without a purpose. To paraphrase Nietzsche, a person who has a why to live can always find a how. My "why" had always been my students. I just needed to find a new "how."
A statement released by the Cuban government said the others in the car "suffered minor injuries" in the crash. Rosa Maria Paya had to briefly leave the government statement to speak with her father's supporters. A recording of the interview is available here. According to the statement, Oswaldo Paya, the son of a Cuban dissident priest, was the driver of the car. "According to what the information we have at the moment, two people died in the accident, according to what was described in the statement, and two people received light injuries. They were released from the hospital. The investigation has been opened, as was announced already, to investigate the facts," Paya's daughter said. According to a report by People's Radio, Paya was traveling with his son, Nelson Paya Escalante, when they were struck by another car. Havana has a poor record for keeping people alive, particularly political prisoners and health workers who could help public health. Paya was a member of Cuba's Republican Opposition Group and was active in various petitions that had sought to put a stop to the island's system of one-party rule and was one of the few dissidents who was able to leave Cuba legally. He was arrested in 2012 and put in prison for an unspecified "crime," although his daughter said Paya had been wrongly charged and that his actual offense was writing a letter in support of Roman Catholic nuns who were in prison after resisting a crackdown on protests. Paya was released from prison in early 2015 and was residing in exile in Miami. He was in his last days with his family and had not made any public appearances. Monday's news prompted an outpouring of grief from relatives and friends. His daughter is a journalist who has been critical of Cuba's government since her father's death. Paya's grave site was covered with messages and flowers. Upon learning of the accident, President Barack Obama issued a statement describing Paya as "an indefatigable voice for
The car crash took place at 1:50 p.m. near Bayamo, Cuba, according to statement released by the Cuban government's International Press Center. In Spanish: Government statement . Paya and passenger Harold Capero died in the accident, the statement said. Two other passengers -- a Spanish citizen and Swedish citizen -- were injured and taken to a hospital, it said. The government statement says there was not a second car involved in the crash and said the rental car that Paya was traveling in lost control and crashed into a tree. Cuban police are investigating the crash, the statement said. On Paya's website, his daughter Rosa Maria posted an audio clip saying his family believed that a second car had been involved and that it had intentionally struck the car in which Paya was traveling. A devout Christian and an engineer, Paya was known far beyond Cuba for his criticisms of the island's socialist government. Cuban doctors battle to control cholera outbreak . In 2002, shortly before former U.S. President Jimmy Carter's visit to Cuba, Paya delivered petitions containing 11,020 signatures calling for democratic elections and freedom of speech to Cuba's National Assembly. Although the initiative -- called the "Varela Project" -- was ignored by Cuba's government, Carter later spoke of Paya's signature drive during a speech that was broadcast on state television in Cuba. The speech was the first time Cuba's government had allowed an American leader to address the populace as well as the first time that many Cubans had heard of Paya's efforts to change the country's political system. Opinion: Should U.S. raise a fist or offer a hand to Cuba? Internal opponents to Cuba's government are routinely labeled as traitors by the state-run media. In 2003, Paya received the European Parliament's Sakharov prize for freedom of expression. The award is named for Soviet dissident Andrei Sakharov and is awarded to those who work to promote human rights and democracy.
1 / 17 Chua Kim San died of a stroke, but in Taiwan's 1960s she might have lived a happy life. In the late 1950s, Chua was a Filipina maid working at a residence in Hong Kong where she was educated. There she met her future husband, Vincent Chua (center), the son of a Chinese immigrant to Hong Kong. After marrying him, she moved to Taiwan, where her marriage to Vincent took root. In 1960 Chua became a Taiwanese citizen and began working as a housemaid in Hong Kong. Her husband also became a Taiwanese citizen. Christopher Bonanos / AP The interior of a two-story house (seen from the outside) at the Ercingezu Village, Zhenjiang County, Taiwan. A family of 16, nine of whom worked at night, lived in the first floor, while nine other people shared the second floor. View of a cupboard in the second floor bathroom, decorated with a decorative fish. Christopher Bonanos / AP A three-year-old Paul Steyn gets dressed inside his mother's bedroom at the Ercingezu Village, Zhenjiang County, Taiwan. Christopher Bonanos / AP The kitchen in front of a still-empty cooking-top window. Also known as "the kitchen," it is a component in which several homes have been built on top of one another, housing family members in a large open space. Christopher Bonanos / AP A fish sits on a door made of a traditional Chinese wooden pallet in the Ercingezu Village, Zhenjiang County, Taiwan. The manner of production of the wooden pallet has been preserved through its refusal to extend any surplus from the outside world. It is a traditional part of home construction that is not required to be reproduced. Before the turn of the twentieth century, the one practical feature of most Chinese homes was that the kitchen door and window opened to the outside. Using modified wooden pallets for most of the rooms, these white sand bricks appear to have been kept out of use from the mainland. Christopher Bonanos / AP A kitchen meal, the entire Chinese family gathered around. This seems to be a family meal, perhaps on the day of their big feast. The cabinet in front of the oven is used for kitchenware. Photo taken during a long lunch while surrounded by family members. Christopher Bonanos / AP
The few shops in village close at 5 p.m., when the nightlife on Hong Kong Island has yet to spark. In recent years, tourists have been flocking to Tai O to glimpse this part of Hong Kong's rapidly disappearing past. But when they arrive, they are greeted by a placard at the bus station decrying: "Mass development will destroy Tai O." It's a sign of the times: Even as tourists boost the coffers of a local economy once dependent on fishing, villagers are deeply ambivalent about the hordes of visitors encroaching on their seaside hamlet. "We are going to lose our distinctive way of life and identity if no one protests against the government plan," said lifelong Tai O resident Wang Waking, 51, who runs the Tai O culture workshop. "I am afraid that the commercially-driven plan is going to turn Tai O into another resort." Villagers like Wang are torn by government plans to add fountains, sculptures and a stage next to the temple to Tin Hau, where generations of fishermen prayed for safety before sailing. The government's US$100 million "Revitalize Tai O" project will also replace patches of wetland by boardwalks and a new plaza will rise near the dock. The project is scheduled to be completed later this year, according to the Hong Kong's Civil Engineering and Development Department spokesperson Carol Ho. Original plans called for tearing down all the village's distinctive stilt houses, but was curtailed after protests by villagers. While the redevelopment celebrates Tai O's seafaring heritage -- in 1960, villagers caught 30% of all seafood sold in Hong Kong, according to the book "Tai O History" -- it comes in the wake of a 2012 Hong Kong law banning of commercial trawling. That move was applauded by environmentalists but decried by local fishers. "It wrecks my heart to see fishermen forced to sell their large trawlers," said a local fisherman surnamed Wong, who says he catches 70% less after the ban. Wong, who sells homemade shrimp paste, now must import shrimp from mainland China. Tai O is separated from the rest of Hong Kong by steep, rocky hills. Before 1990, the only way to get to Tai O was by boat. Permits to drive on the town's single road are only granted to villagers and public buses.
A defining moment came in March 1887 in a Courchevel suburb. "The third match of the first season of play on the new Winter Olympics ground, was a game between France and Hungary," reports the International Olympic Committee. The match was "volleyed all over Courchevel's treacherous slopes by flaring feuds of whistle and firmness, and was resolutely ended in a remarkable number of goals, by both sides." Brazilian President Dilma Rousseff (married to British academic Cristovao Soares) must have been "feeling haggard" after telling local reporters in a rowdy exchange that the government's rainy day fund would be saved for the party to come (but in public, you know?). Nelson Mandela's funeral. The biggest loss in South African life since the 1994 referendum that ended apartheid, took place in December at the age of 95 . Among his most famous quotes: "I do not wish to be remembered as the president who gave up. I want to be remembered as the president who led us to freedom." Vanuatu. World's most famous baby . A one-month-old girl in 2011, named Laura, shocked the public, and her parents, by perfectly inking her own surname on her arm while at a seaside resort in Vanuatu. Laura Soares, who was born on December 10, took her place alongside Martina Navratilova, Silvana Mangano and Madonna among the truly famous babies. Russia. The Sochi Winter Olympics. As Europeans claim New England or Southern Spain in a fight for the right to be named after beautiful vistas and the titular winter sports, those far closer to home must now raise their game. New Zealand's snow-capped Kaikoura -- where Olympic skiers love to stay in simple accommodations -- was afflicted with a record number of incidents due to high winds in 2013. Businesses with a hint of New Zealand delicacy fish and chips or kiwi pastry are certainly capitalizing on the publicity, reporting a sea of curious visitors. Trinidad and Tobago. Tim Burton fanatics will find Peter Rabbit a perfect name for the country's first-ever built national monument. On my regular travels, I discover several things: -- Hotel balconies and trees are an absolute must, just to have a few hours in the sun. There are no indoor pools -- The only pools are located in the swimming pools. That's why we build them that way! -- It's still the curry!
It has the world's most successful international team, winning the World Cup five times. It calls what many claim to be the world's greatest player, Pele, one of its own. And company managers and bosses are known to demand their employees skip work to watch the big games. The World Cup next year then, to be hosted over June and July in 18 cities across the country, is likely to be memorable, to say the least. Throw in the rest of the country, which includes rainforests, beaches and a party culture that makes most New Year's Eve soirees look decidedly po-faced, and you have the makings of an epic trip. Daisy Parker from ABTA (Association of British Travel Agents) suggests visiting some of the country's more remote areas. "The Brazilians' love of a party is going to make it a must-visit long haul destination for 2014," she says. "Once fans have flown that far we predict many will stay on to check out areas like the Amazon basin and the amazing Iguazu Falls. Brazil's beaches are also some of the best in the world." Explore offers a 14-day Pure Brazil tour, which starts from $5,913 per person (not including flights). Panama: Canal's 100th birthday . The Panama Canal's 100-year anniversary arguably is not, in and of itself, a top five reason for visiting the country in 2014. But the events surrounding the big day and Panama's other attractions certainly are. "August 2014 marks 100 years since the completion of the Panama Canal, and that's likely to attract more attention to the destination," says Mary Moses, general manager at PEAK South America. "However, Panama has a lot more to offer travelers than just the canal -- volcanoes, rainforests, coffee plantations and beautiful beaches on both the Atlantic and Pacific coasts." Peregrine Adventures offers a 10-day Panama Highlights tour. Prices start from $2,171 per person (excluding flights). Myanmar: Tourism 'Master Plan' Myanmar has been touted as "the next big tourism destination" for a few years already, but getting around the country has proved tricky. ATMs have been absent or limited to locals only, the Internet was something nobody appeared to have heard of and travel was restricted to places the government was happy for you to see. That's started to change already, and next year it's going to accelerate. "The Myanmar Ministry of Hotels and Tourism has prepared a 'Master Plan' and 'Responsible Tourism Policy'
"The collection shows how the art world functioned when it mattered -- not so much in the period after the Civil War, when there was less money and important figures had moved away -- but from colonial times on," Heckscher said.The American Wing of the Metropolitan Museum of Art was reopened at the end of 2014 after a substantial $70 million renovation to the galleries that trace American history from the 15th century to the present.The upgrades -- which allow the Museum to display the oldest artwork in the country on the first floor and display the most recent by the second floor -- were completed in time for the opening of the show "American Masters: From the Metropolitan Museum of Art" on March 7. "American Masters" features the works of more than 80 artists, ranging from Thomas Cole to Jackson Pollock.The American Wing, which includes the town halls, the Colonial Dining Room and the French Galleries, has been closed to visitors since the fall of 2014. Following a limited preview tour for media members, the galleries were reopened to the public this past Friday.While a few early pieces are now on view, including from the Henry Moore collection and a world premiere by Pop artist Roy Lichtenstein, many other works will remain hidden in halls and closets to maintain their integrity, Heckscher said.The American Wing is one of four American galleries housed at the Met. It's the largest, housed in the largest space of the museum."The collection shows how the art world functioned when it mattered -- not so much in the period after the Civil War, when there was less money and important figures had moved away -- but from colonial times on," Heckscher said.The Old Master collection in the wing, by contrast, was acquired 25 years ago by the Met to show the art of the early American period. A number of rare pieces were acquired for the American Wing, including Paul Klee's "Two Lavender Girls" and a sculpture of President Abraham Lincoln by Claes Oldenburg and Coosje van Bruggen."There are many pieces in the American Wing that are old master paintings, that would have gone anywhere because this collection is so prestigious," said Heckscher. "That has served us well at the Metropolitan."The American Wing also includes a stunning cast of Lady Olga Maisov (ca. 1499) by a Dutch sculptor, a valuable collection of landscapes by John James Audubon and a rare portrait of Lucretia Bell (ca. 1503), who became the first person in Europe to have a picture made of her face.The 19th-century Romanesque chapel windows from New York were donated to the Metropolitan Museum by Franklin Delano Roosevelt.Many pieces in the collection have historic and monetary significance to the Met. The wood and tile-clad halls of the Staten Island courthouse where Edward Snowden was detained in June 2013 hold works by Thomas Cole and Thomas Kinkade.A bronze sculpture of Abraham Lincoln by Russian artist Anish Kapoor is installed in the rotunda as a tribute to the museum's bond with New York after the devastating terrorist attacks of 9/11.The Met's commitment to the acquisition of original American art and a rigorous approach to producing important American masterpieces echoes one of the primary goals of the trustees in the late 1800s, said Anna Neufeld, Special Assistant to the Chief Curator of the American Wing."They were interested in preserving and restoring many of the great masterpieces from New York's museum, and felt the collections from New York were influential in the nation, not merely in the history of that community but throughout the nation," Neufeld said. "It's part of the reason why there is so much on display from the Victorian era up through the 20th century."The decision to close the American Wing was not a decision taken lightly, Neufeld said. But the renovation work, which allowed the Wing to be entered after repairs and refurbishment were completed, was designed to extend the lives of the buildings, he said. (CNN) -- With reporting by Will Ripley.
"Most of the major trends, the events of importance in the nation's history, were addressed by artists in one way or another -- war, Civil War, the environment, all of these things," he said. Now, the American Wing at the museum has been re-configured for the 21st century and has re-opened to the public following a decade-long renovation program. "The display of the art is broadly chronological," said Heckscher, explaining that the re-designed galleries move from early colonial paintings, onto the post-Revolutionary period, the Hudson River School, the Civil War era and finally to the late-nineteenth century paintings of John Singer Sargent and James McNeill Whistler. Hermitage sets up 'mini-museum' in Madrid's Prado . Also on display are collections of American decorative arts, including furniture, silverware and ceramics. "We want to treat these different media as works of art on their own -- it's an effort to have a broader a view of what constitutes art," said Heckscher. But the jewel in the collection, according to Heckscher, is Emanuel Leutze's monumental painting Washington Crossing the Delaware, which depicts George Washington crossing an iceberg-strewn river with his troops at a pivotal moment in the revolution. "It was a major history painting, Leutze had done a series of history paintings that documented and touched on the evolution of the United States as a democratic society," said curator at the American Wing Elizabeth Mankin Kornhauser. Leutze grew up in America but subsequently moved back to his native Germany, where he painted Washington Crossing the Delaware in 1851. "The intention was really to fuel the quest for freedom in Europe and Germany by looking back in time to this great hero of the American Revolution, creating this kind of mythic historical scene, an event that was a turning point in the revolution," said Kornhauser. It was later taken to America and served as a focal point during the Civil War, Kornhauser said, and has fallen in and out of public favor ever since. Now it takes pride of place in the new galleries. Also on display following a recent acquisition -- obtained just three days before the new wing opened in January -- is a sculpture of Abraham Lincoln by Augustus Saint-Gaudens, a reduction of the one that stands in Lincoln Park in Chicago. "This is particularly exciting for us because it was originally in the collection of John Hay and John Hay was Lincoln's private secretary during the Civil War," said curator Thayer Tolles. Khubiliai Khan's riches travel to New York's Metropolitan Museum of Art . The sculpture portrays Lincoln deep in thought and looking, according to Thayer, "as if the weight of the world is on his shoulders." Though the works in the collection are arranged chronologically, themes emerge throughout -- notably the importance of the environment. Kornhauser describes a painting by Thomas Cole, founder of the landscape-oriented, mid-19th-century Hudson River School, depicting a tourist attraction on the Connecticut River. "He's portrayed settled land on the right and wilderness on the left and it's essentially his manifesto to preserve the wilderness, to not lose sight of the beauty and spiritual importance of the wilderness as we rush to settle the land," said Kornhauser. "It's almost like the beginning of the environmental movement, portrayed in this painting," she continued. This also comes through in the 1918 bronze sculpture "End of the Trail," by James Earle Fraser, which portrays a Native American sat slumped on his exhausted horse and which functions as a metaphor, according to Thayer, "for the effect of Euro-American settlement on the American West." What also emerges throughout the collection is the enduring influence of European styles in American art. Through the works, said Tholles, you can see "an interesting blend of European sophistication and aesthetics with American subjects." This carries through from the early colonial portraits by British artists, which influenced American painters such as John Singleton Copley, all the way through to Europhile John Singer Sargent.
Traversing the Los Angeles Museum of Natural History's fossil terrain, every so often I roll into the underground cavern where the museum's giant fossil-filled glass case of U-shaped polished angular horizontal bars borders a little bridge called Geologic Park. The structural steel post-and-beam construction supports are approaching and tightening. In the middle is one of those whale sounds that go right up your nose. It's rustling, not hum, though. Zed probably went to use the bridge so that no dinosaurs could crawl through and sneak up on him. This mammoth was taller than me (the modern-day 25,000-pound "Gator" dinosaur), a 2,000-pounder. He was one of the biggest Columbian mammoths ever found in America, archaeologists say. It's not just the mammoth that is extraordinarily rare here. It's the fact that a nearly intact Tyrannosaurus rex skeleton that's also embedded in the sedimentary rock crust around this underground lair is part of it. "Zed" was unearthed in February in a mostly grassy marsh along the Western San Fernando Valley. A few months later, rakes and shovels collected bones of the marine reptiles, a mastodon and modern horses that, maybe, died together. After the bones were removed from the rock, Yale paleontologist Richard Evans assured me that the real fossils are just below the dirt. It is a stunning reminder of how beastly life was in Los Angeles during the Pleistocene Epoch, a period more than 10,000 years ago when the area's ancient plant life and fauna transitioned toward becoming a diverse, warm and forested environment. Then there are what looks like ancient horses (left), the direct ancestor of modern horses. Zed, like the dinosaurs, lived at least 2,000 years ago, and likely 3,000 to 7,000 years ago, said William Krepps, executive director of the Los Angeles County Natural History Museum (of whales and more) and a paleontologist. These were the earliest kings of this city. "A phenomenal find," as one museum official described it. The skeleton of a Columbian mammoth was found along with a pair of raptor raptors at the lab. It's being called the museum's most important find in almost a century. The mammoth was unearthed in just six weeks in "nothing more than the corner of a freshly sown seed," said museum curator of paleontology Kees Jeuzmansen. As luck would have it, the two student archaeologists who excavated him, Tim and Elizabeth Schoepflin, found multiple skeletons of Columbian mammoths just feet away. Neither one, though, could tell if the excavations were related. That led to a frantic race to obtain the excavation permits, which probably were worth an annual fee. When this site was discovered in November 2012, rakes and shovels removed bones of marine reptiles, a mastodon and modern horses that, maybe, died together. "Zed" was unearthed in February in a mostly grassy marsh along the Western San Fernando Valley. "Zed" was unearthed in February in a mostly grassy marsh along the Western San Fernando Valley. "Just weeks later the biologists were back -- we got big DNA samples so we can see when it was living and there's got to be some levels of overlap, but then they found the shells of long-tailed fish," he said. Notably, "There's the three ambers," he said, using a separate scientific term to describe fossils from what some scientists refer to as the "Sweet Susana Plain." There was a nursery for darter fish just downriver in the La Brea Tar Pits, and some scientists suggest that this river channel fed a reservoir where mammoths and the Columbian mammoths they hunted might have set up a winter home, putting the Columbian mammoth back in the prime meat-producing waters of its birthright. See, the Large Ice Age gave rise to a lot of fun stories from ancient times. Mammoths even have
Page Museum. Zed was discovered at a construction site in the heart of Los Angeles. An earth mover helping to build an underground parking garage near the L.A. County Museum of Art uncovered the mammoth's skull, according to project director Christopher Shaw. "The skull was hit and shaved off ... by a scraper," Shaw told CNN Thursday. "We don't know just how smashed up it is, but it's fairly intact because it's a huge jacket we put it around." The mammoth's fossil was found along with 16 other deposits at the site that paleontologists "tree-boxed" along with the surrounding dirt, creating 23 massive crates weighing between 5 and 53 tons that were then lifted out intact. Zed's remains were encased in a plaster jacket. The construction was being monitored by a consulting firm because the site is so close to the La Brea tar pits -- a site that has yielded between 3 million and 4 million fossilized bones. Construction on the parking garage began in 2006 but it took two more years for all the recovered materials to be handed over to researchers at the Page Museum, who began analyzing the various fossils in June, Shaw said. "It's very exciting for us because each one of these ... could be different ages in the past 10,000 to 45,000 years," Shaw said. John Harris, the head curator of the Page Museum, publicly announced the finding of "a whole new treasure trove of fossils" on Wednesday. He described it as "the most important discovery" for the museum "of the last 90 years." Shaw said the announcement was made to "create interest" in the museum's discovery. Among the most interesting items is likely to be Zed, who is believed to have died in his late 40s. Mammoths are thought to have had an average lifespan of about 60 years. Not all of Zed's remains have been cleaned off and analyzed. "Right now we have opened the plaster jacket of four sections that were excavated, including vertebrae and ribs and pelvis, one tusk and the lower jaw," Shaw said. "It will take another six to 12 months to open everything." Shaw said both of Zed's tusks were found intact, which is very rare. "Previously, we've found mammoths but the tusk material was very poorly preserved," Shaw said. "It's very exciting to us to have these two complete, beautifully preserved tusks." The excitement generated by Zed and the rest of the paleontological find could help boost the Page Museum's attendance and funding, which is key as many museums are seeing their attendance dry up during the recession. "The cleaning of Zed can be viewed inside the museum inside the 'fishbowl' -- a windowed area -- as parts of his bones are being cleaned," Shaw said. "So people come to see us and we've constructed small exhibits. It will attract a lot of people and that will help our funding situation." Researchers hope to have the entire skeleton on display by next year. Shaw said it is unique to have such a major fossil find in the heart of an urban center like Los Angeles. "I've always said we're kind of spoiled here in Rancho La Brea," he said. "It's not like going to the Gobi Desert where you can't take a shower for weeks." While the process of cleaning and analyzing the fossils is very intricate and time consuming, Shaw said it is a rare experience for researchers to come in to work and not know what they will discover that day. "Every day we come to work, we're uncovering things that haven't seen the light of day for 40,000 years," he said. "It's an exciting thing that we're doing just that."
WASHINGTON -- U.S. Attorney General Eric Holder on Monday announced a Justice Department program to try to thwart recruitment by extremist groups such as ISIS, attempting to involve social and mental health workers as well as religious leaders and police to spot radicalization early. "The Muslim community has been among the first to stand up against violent extremist ideology and the people spreading it," Holder said. "They deserve to be heard when the FBI asks them to aid in the investigation of acts of terrorism." Holder made the announcement at the National Safety Council in suburban Virginia. Holder said the FBI's Behavioral Analysis Unit will study existing outreach programs aimed at Islamic leaders and psychologists, to see whether they work best. For instance, such outreach might include classroom discussions with at-risk youth or gatherings aimed at helping parents of children at risk of radicalization. The outreach will specifically look at trying to identify those at risk of extremist recruitment through religious leaders, as well as to gather information about what prompted those individuals to follow the ISIS message. Ultimately, the bureau will evaluate the programs and could expand them or tailor them to best fit terrorism investigations. "I realize that this kind of outreach may be more expensive than a wiretap," Holder said. "But we simply cannot afford to spend money on programs that do not work. I don't know what it will take for this country to figure out how to defeat violent extremism," he said. Earlier this month, the Justice Department announced it is offering a $1 million reward for information leading to the arrest of anyone involved in the killing of US journalist James Foley . Two ISIS operatives are believed to have beheaded Foley on camera, and the money is aimed at identifying and tracking down the men. The government is also offering $250,000 for information leading to the arrest of an ISIS member, although such information must directly lead to the death of an American citizen.
This effort is an outgrowth of existing community outreach programs that in recent years have linked Justice Department prosecutors, the FBI and the Department of Homeland Security with imams and local organizations hoping to prevent young people from joining terror groups. Despite those efforts, authorities say more than 100 Americans have traveled in recent years to join groups involved in the Syrian civil war. More than a dozen are believed to have joined ISIS, which calls itself the Islamic State. What's the world going to do about ISIS? The FBI and other agencies are grappling with trying to track those who not only support radical groups online but also help recruit and try to travel to join the fight. The Obama administration says the new program will reach out to social services and mental health workers to help spread what is known about extremist groups' recruitment methods. The idea is not only to counteract recruitment but also to encourage local community intervention efforts before law enforcement has to pursue possible prosecution. "We have established processes for detecting American extremists who attempt to join terror groups abroad," Holder said in a video message posted on the Justice Department's website. "And we have engaged in extensive outreach to communities here in the U.S. -- so we can work with them to identify threats before they emerge, to disrupt homegrown terrorists and to apprehend would-be violent extremists. But we can -- and we must -- do even more." A U.S. official said one of the first such places expected to be part of the new program is Minneapolis, where in recent years young people have been recruited to join the Islamist group Al-Shabaab in Somalia, and more recently Syrian Islamist rebel groups. The Justice Department has worked with local religious and community groups to help provide support when those communities face discrimination while using those contacts to find out when there are concerns about radicalization. However, in recent years, some imams and family members have complained about the heavy law enforcement response when they
Some 796 migrants, mostly Eritreans, who were on board the packed freighter sailing toward the rocky Italian coast reached shore Monday, the Italian coast guard said.Authorities say the 19-year-old Mexican crew member abandoned the ship, but was later rescued and brought aboard a rescue vessel after attempting to hide among the migrants. Two other crew members were also taken to the facility.Marini told reporters that about 70 refugees were already in the transfer vessel before the ship had docked.By the time the sea-going freighter reached Ashigara on Monday, the migrants had already disembarked.The coast guard declined to reveal how the vessel got there, but the Medecins Sans Frontieres group said it was likely a helicopter helped to transport the migrants after they were picked up earlier Monday on the Mediterranean coast.The port official said that while the migrant numbers had exceeded those estimated three weeks ago, they were still short of the 657 that had been feared dead after an accident earlier this month.About 3,700 migrants had been rescued off the coast of Libya in July. An official feared that hundreds more died after the ship capsized, but about 200 people survived.The shipwreck marked one of the deadliest incidents of its kind in the Mediterranean, a notoriously deadly sea crossing from Africa. The crew had abandoned the freighter, which was cruising toward the rocky coast . Advertisement Italy (CNN) It could have been, in the words of the Italian coast guard, a disaster. But thanks to authorities, a ship on course to crash against the rocky Italian coast was stopped in time, saving
When it entered Italian search and rescue waters, the coast guard sent helicopters with six men, who boarded the ship and took control. The course of the vessel was reversed to avoid a collision with the rocks, and it was piloted instead to Gallipoli, in Italy's southern Puglia region. It docked safely there Wednesday. The freighter carried 796 migrants, the coast guard said Thursday, most believed to be from war-torn Syria. Authorities on Wednesday put the number of migrants on board at 768. The crew of the Blue Sky M apparently jumped ship. The coast guard said a collision would not only have led to the deaths of passengers, but would also have created an environmental disaster. It said a "real disaster" was avoided. The freighter sent a distress signal near the Greek island of Corfu on Tuesday, alerting Italian and Greek authorities to the situation on board. The Greek Merchant Marine Ministry and the Greek Navy have said the pilot of a Greek helicopter that flew over the cargo ship spoke with the captain, who said the ship was not in distress and did not need assistance. Floriana Segreto, a spokeswoman for the Italian coast guard in Rome, said there were no deaths related to the Blue Sky M incident. She added that about 100 people have been hospitalized, mainly because of the cold and exhaustion. It was not immediately clear where the migrants will go. The authorities will investigate what happened to the crew and how the freighter reached Italy's waters.
Have you got what it takes to be a reporter for your favorite team? As part of CNN's coverage of world football, we are looking for football fans who
Alternatively, click on the video of the iReporters who have already joined the team to see their latest rant.
(CNN) -- The United Nations humanitarian affairs officer in southern Kyrgyzstan said Sunday that the U.N. is sending in more supplies to assist the thousands displaced by the ongoing fighting, as it tries to come up with $71 million dollars to provide for the roughly 37,000 people displaced by the two weeks of conflict.Dmitry Krushnakov said in a statement that in the last 48 hours the U.N. has sent "more than 20 tons of food and 4 tons of water" and airlifted emergency medical supplies, adding that they plan to bring medical, shelter and other supplies later in the week.Unrest began July 31 when ethnic clashes broke out between Kyrgyz and Uzbeks in southern Kyrgyzstan between Osh and Jalalabad, officials said.The fighting has left more than half a million people homeless, displaced thousands more from their homes and shut down the more than 10,000 U.S. military base on Kyrgyzstan's southern border.In a radio interview, the acting president of Kyrgyzstan said she was sure that the United States would continue to use the airbase as long as Washington "chooses Kyrgyzstan as a supplier and useer of its supplies," adding that "it's an important source of cooperation and that it's perfectly logical, from our point of view, for it to continue."Otunbayeva added that, if she assumed the presidency permanently, her first order of business would be to shut down the airbase.Otunbayeva said she was confident that, if she assumes the presidency permanently, her first order of business would be to shut down the airbase.She also told Kommersant that, if she assumed the presidency permanently, her first order of business would be to close down the airbase.
"By all means, we have to give hope that we shall restore the city, return all the refugees and create all conditions for that. I think the entire world will be helping us, because we two peoples have the goodwill to live in peace and friendship together," Otunbayeva said. A U.S. official on Friday called for a "substantial" investigation into the killings. Assistant Secretary of State Robert Blake was at a refugee camp near the border in Uzbekistan, where thousands of ethnic Uzbeks fled violence in neighboring Kyrgyzstan. Blake said he wants Kyrgyzstan authorities to investigate who carried out the attacks on ethnic Uzbeks and to bring those responsible to justice. He planned to go to the Kyrgyz capital of Bishkek later Friday to deliver the message personally, he said. Blake praised the Uzbek government for working to support the refugees who have flooded into their country. About 120,000 have crossed the border into Uzbekistan, far more than officials had been expecting. The Obama administration is committed to assisting the Uzbek government with supplies and other aid, Blake said at the camp near Yor Kishlok, where refugees were living in rows of tents. While countries and nongovernmental organizations are sending aid to the region, Otunbayeva's assistant, Azimbek Beknazarov, said in a news release Friday morning that if England doesn't extradite Maksim Bakiev, the son of deposed Kyrgyz President Kurmanbek Bakiev, then the Kyrgyz government will consider "closing the Manas airbase." However, the interim government representative, Temir Sariev, told CNN that, "This is only Mr. Beknazarov's opinion and, so far, the interim government is not sharing this opinion.
Paul Bedard, The Washington Examiner's "Washington Secrets" columnist, can be contacted at pbedard@washingtonexaminer.com.
In light of what has been a long and tumultuous political season, here are my strongest arguments for Mitt Romney, Rep. Paul Ryan,
Here's something we're not entirely sure how to make sense of: Selena Gomez is so mature that she recorded an album named after a song from the same musical, "Grease." "Stars Dance" takes its cues from "Grease," including high octane rock tracks such as "Come & Get It" and the nostalgic "Come & Get It." But the sounds also hint at Gomez's personal growth and maturity, as the album's tracks include slightly more guitar-driven numbers such as "Best Mistake" and "Oh Boy." "I think it's a good balance between that -- the heavy rock but just trying to keep the soulfulness of the pop-rock while staying true to who I am and who I've been as an artist," she told The Hollywood Reporter at a launch party for "Stars Dance" earlier this month. When asked if she realized at the beginning of her career that her goals would be different than those of her former co-stars, the starlet said, "I just know that I wanted to do music for as long as I could. I feel like that's what I've always wanted to do, so this record was an opportunity for me to try it out even further." Gomez said she recently recorded a new song for her next album, and thinks fans will be surprised by the sound.
CNN sat down with the multi-hyphenate on the morning of her birthday, and she opened up about how much she's grown since leaving teendom behind. "The past year and a half has been really transitional for me, just personally, as well as transitioning into becoming a woman," she said. "I still feel like I'm 15 sometimes and then other times, I'm wanting to feel comfortable in my body and my skin." For this album, Gomez drew inspiration from her favorite pop star, Britney Spears, as well as from her good friend Taylor Swift for a more mature sound. The former "Mouse House" starlet revealed she is most proud of this album because it is the first time she was able to dedicate herself fully to her music. "I was able to have full creative control over it. Before, I would have maybe a month or two to record an album, and I'd have to do my series at the same time and tour on the weekends. I wasn't in the right mindset to fully give my all." Gomez began acting professionally at a young age, nabbing roles in children's programs such as "Barney and Friends." As more former child stars are seen heading down dark and destructive paths, Gomez has always made a conscious effort to keep from falling down the same rabbit hole.
A Kurdish rebel leader was assassinated by a sniper in northwestern Syria, a spokesman for an Islamist rebel group said Friday. Leaders in the town of Idlib said Salah Muhammad al-Najjar was shot and killed by a sniper while riding through the town. He had recently joined the revolution to oust the Syrian regime, spokesman Abu Ali al-Jawlani said. Al-Najjar was a national council member and military commander for an Islamist rebel group, Ahrar al-Sham, al-Jawlani said. "The leader of this group is dead, and the explosion caused him the same fate," the spokesman said. Since breaking ties with Al Qaeda in 2013, the Syrian rebel group has worked to separate itself from Islamic extremists, with which it previously fought. Al-Najjar was just appointed secretary-general of the Syrian Democratic Forces, the spokesman said. No one immediately claimed responsibility for his killing. It was not immediately clear whether al-Najjar was involved in fighting in the Idlib area. Human rights groups have also accused Islamic extremists of targeting Kurdish women and children in attacks around Syria. Raqiya news agency in northwestern Syria posted a photo of a blanket covering a woman and children. "Raqiya news office refers to the death of two female members of Al Nusra Front at Al Halaby," a Raqiya news agency said in a statement posted online Friday, referring to the al Qaeda-linked group Jabhat al-Nusra. It did not identify the women. Raqiya also released a photograph of members of the other jihadist group, Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant, placing the dead body on a floor. Raqiya linked the incident to a violent attack against a carload of Kurdish pilgrims, and said that 18 pilgrims, including seven women, were wounded. There was no comment from the government or from Kurdish officials in northwestern Syria. -CNN's Diana Magnay and Jon Ostrower contributed to this report.
"The violence continues unabated," Victoria Nuland, State Department spokeswoman, said on Friday. Tammo's death was reported by three groups -- the Local Coordination Committees of Syria, the Syrian Observatory for Human Rights and Avaaz, an international activist organization. Tammo's son and another activist, Zahida Rashkilo, were injured. Avaaz said Tammo was meeting with activists at the time. Avaaz said the attackers were members of the Shabiha, the pro-government militia. "The Kurdish people are very angry as a result," an activist told Avaaz. Kurds live in a contiguous area that spreads across Iraq, Iran, Syria and Turkey. Kurdish rebels have fought for an independent state. Human Rights Watch, which notes that the Kurds are the largest non-Arab ethnic minority in Syria, has estimated that Kurds make up about 10% of Syria's population. The Syrian government, viewing Kurdish identity as a threat, has suppressed the group's political and cultural rights. The Syrian National Council announced this month that it will "represent the Syrian revolution" inside and outside the country in an effort to end the government of Syrian President Bashar al-Assad. The council "will work on mobilizing all groups of the Syrian people and provide all kinds of necessary support to advance the revolution and achieve the goals of our people that include the toppling of the current regime, including the head of the regime, and building a democratic, multiparty system in a civilian state that provides equality to all its citizens, without any kind of discrimination," they said. The LCC said groups including the Muslim Brotherhood of Syria, the Revolution Forces, the Public Council for Revolution Forces and the Superior Council of the Revolution have all joined it in the opposition government. The idea takes a page from the success of the National Transitional Council in Libya, where the opposition movement managed to drive strongman Moammar Gadhafi from power.
VIDEO INSIDE STORY Will Coneys is a member of the Georgia Crush battle-royal team. "It's like coming out of your shell when you come out here," he says. "It's just so much fun." You don't exactly need to be a professional wrestler to compete in a fight-royal bout -- in fact, at least at this fight-royal event, you don't have to have a background in martial arts at all. But you do need some sort of sporting background. Coneys is all about form. In the swing pole category, "I use my range of motions to manipulate and coordinate my head and upper body so I'm not riding the edge of the pole with your body weight," he says. He blends the physical art of wrestling with the gymnastics that go into basketball, and the precision of martial arts with the pop and kick of karate. And once upon a time, he wore a straight sleeve of Lycra wrestling briefs, or "wire shorts," as he calls them. CNN, along with four other media outlets, was allowed to fly into Atlanta for its premiere. You can watch our in-depth profile of Coneys here.
The shirtless man explodes forward once more, from standing, shooting agressively into the air with final, winning flip. This is "tricking" -- a lightning-fast mix of martial arts, gymnastics and breakdancing that has spent 20 years quietly spreading across gymnasium floors and internet video sites, but is now set to burst out. Read this: The street kid who grew into a 'Snake Man' In the burgeoning world of tricking, 23-year-old Will Coneys is the new hero, the bare-chested, high-kicking victor in the Atlanta battle, and champion of tricking's first international "Throwdown" tournament on 24 August. Meet the tricker . Coneys says it all started when he was a child, in Arlington, Virginia. He sat watching wide-eyed as Jackie Chan and the Power Rangers blazed across the TV screen with superheroic stunts and frenzied action sequences. "As a kid you think 'Wow, I want to do that!'" he says. When he first heard of tricking it was little more than a hobby for likeminded teens with a fondness for impressive acrobatics. Coneys had spent much of his youth studying dance and teaching himself to do gymnastic tumbling moves before taking martial arts lessons aged 16 -- ultimately earning a first degree black
"The cute clothes were so easy to pull off," recalls Moore, who was on her first vacation to Costa Rica when the women were inspired to start a similar brand in the United States. "The trend is to go for a comfortable, chic look," adds Botica, who co-founded the business with Moore after the women witnessed a tanning salon in their vacation photos. "Now, there's no longer a need to push yourself to get to a bronze tan." Instead, Botica and Moore urge skin care and sun protection to be an active part of summertime. That means using a broad-spectrum sunscreen in the days leading up to and after your vacation to shield your skin from potentially damaging ultraviolet rays (UVA and UVB). A broad-spectrum sunscreen blocks both UVA and UVB rays. "If you're going on vacation with your whole family, you have to cover up and wear sunscreen," Moore says. "In this age of digital technology, we have access to images of people we don't know in natural environments and be a part of that conversation." Instead of slathering on baby oil and baking in the sun until turning red as a tomato, more beachgoers are donning wide-brimmed hats, flowing tunics and hiding from ultraviolet rays under large umbrellas. Moore, 29, and Botica, 27, noticed this shift in sunbathing fashion trends during a trip to the beach two years ago. "Instead of tanning and trying to get as bronze as possible, people were being really smart about the sun and covering up in really cute, fashionable ways," says Moore, who co-founded the business with Botica after the women witnessed a tanning salon in their vacation photos. It seems this mindset is seeping into the fashion world. More than 5 million years ago, an ancient amphibian named Quetzalcoatl began to grow wings and dinosaurs began migrating from one fossil site to another. The body symmetry of these sea-dwelling creatures set the stage for modern jet setters, says Murphy Hack, a New York University geology professor who studies the fossil record. Despite recent evidence that UVA rays are more harmful than UVB rays, parents still worry about exposing their children to the sun. "Children are more vulnerable to UVB radiation," Hack says. "The human body has relatively weaker defenses than the rest of the animal kingdom, so the amount of UVA we're exposed to is higher than the amount of UVB." Being exposed to the sun for prolonged periods of time could result in premature skin aging, skin cancer and premature aging, according to the Skin Cancer Foundation, a nonprofit organization which promotes skin cancer awareness, prevention and treatment. Skin cancer is the most common form of cancer among adults ages 15 to 39, according to the Skin Cancer Foundation. Sunscreen is a must Women who are concerned about their skin care and avoiding further health hazards should avoid the beach or a pool -- and keep the sun at bay from the beginning of their trip through their stay, says Botica. Hydrate the body with water and avoid direct sunlight for at least an hour prior to the start of your vacation. "You get enough sun in the day," Moore says. "As far as staying in the shade, that's the way you want to be." During the day, a lightweight, broad-spectrum sunscreen with an SPF of at least 15 works best. Take time to pat down your entire body, then reapply the sunscreen before, during and after bathing.
New companies like Mott 50 are fulfilling people's needs to stay healthy and stylish. Until a few years ago, those seeking special sun-blocking clothing could order apparel only from specialized catalogs. The options were often limited to drab colors and basic cuts. Today, new clothing lines have recognized shoppers' desires to buy outfits they can wear to parties and show off to friends. "Everything is style-driven and designed to incorporate the latest trends," says Melissa Marks, founder of Cabana Life, a sun-blocking clothing company she started in 2005 after she was diagnosed with skin cancer. As the rate of skin cancer continues to rise -- with more than 2 million people diagnosed in the United States each year -- more Americans are seeking sun-safe products. The list includes clothing that contains UPF (ultraviolet protection factor) values, which span from 15 to 50-plus. The higher the value, the more the fabric absorbs UV rays and prevents them from hitting skin. But consumers should not confuse UPF with SPF (sun protection factor) values that rate protection from ultraviolet-B rays in sunscreen because "they don't necessarily match," says Vilma Cokkinides, an epidemiologist and director of research for the American Cancer Society in Atlanta. Sleeves, shade your best bet for sun protection . The UPF value is based on the color and weave of the fabric. "Shirts with tight weaves are much more protective than shirts with loose weaves," says Martin Weinstock, chief of dermatology at the VA Medical Center in Providence, Rhode Island. While darker hues are more protective, clothing companies have created bright, popping colors that are UPF-approved and in style this summer. Some lines sell apparel that covers most of the skin, such as dresses with long sleeves and swim shorts that extend past the knee. Mott 50 caters to people who want to protect themselves and still have fun in the sun. "We sort of say, 'Go out, wear your swim suit, your bikini, get the color that you want and desire, but ... when you're covering up and you're not looking to get color, then wear something that is certified with the UVA and UVB protection,' " Moore said. Moore's business partner Botica has a family history of skin cancer. She said women concerned about wrinkles and the sun's effect on aging tend to buy their products, including women in their 20s and 30s. Other customers have been diagnosed with skin cancer and need clothing to protect themselves from UVA and UVB rays. Some purchase items like Henley shirts and colorful sundresses because they think they're "cute," Moore said. "The fact that it has skin protection is an added value." For Marks, designing trendy skin-protective clothing is the main goal. Marks was a merchandise expert for fashion magazines such as Vogue, Vanity Fair and Seventeen before she was diagnosed with malignant melanoma at age 26. At the time, her dermatologist said she needed to wear skin-protective clothing -- something Marks was unfamiliar with. "Here I am in the fashion world, I had never heard such a thing," she said. New melanoma drug helps patients . When she started researching UPF clothing, she was disappointed by what was on the market. "I thought, 'OK, no wonder I had never heard about it, because it's not something me or any of my friends would want to put on and march around wearing,' " Marks said.
Advertisement Related Content Update: Casey Anthony files motion for motion to reconsider plea Do you remember that 911 call? They played it for jurors during Anthony's murder trial last year. Back then, it was one of the most talked about moments of the trial. At 10:03 p.m. on June 16, 2008, 911 operators in Orange County received a call from a young woman who said: "You know, I'm staying with my parents and ... our daughter has been missing for a month." The woman, whose identity has been kept secret by the courts and will remain so, said she last saw her daughter, Caylee, one month earlier. It was an anonymous call to 911, a gut-wrenching one, in which the caller was calm and consistent in her account of what had happened to her daughter. As the dispatcher hung up, she heard in the background an emotional cackle. When an operator called back, Caylee's mother was on the line. She was hysterical. "I need you to hurry up and come over here and tell them where my daughter is," Casey Anthony told the operator. "I have no idea what your daughter has done, because we haven't heard from her since July 16," the operator said. On Friday, Caylee's remains were found in a wooded area near the Anthony family home in Orlando. A forensic anthropologist concluded they were found in the same area where the girl was last seen alive. Anthony was found not guilty last year of killing her daughter. She was convicted of four counts of lying to law enforcement officials during the investigation. She is currently serving an unrelated four-year sentence on an unrelated check fraud charge. AlertMe
The child's grandmother was frantic, talking a mile a minute. But her mother seemed unemotional, disconnected from the drama around her. So began the Caylee Anthony case, a mystery that became a nightly fixture on cable television and captivated true-crime buffs across the country. Today, the tot's 23-year-old mother, Casey Anthony, is in jail, charged with first-degree murder, and faces the death penalty if convicted. She denies harming her daughter or having anything to do with her disappearance. Her attorney, Jose Baez, has said that once all the facts are known, it will become clear that his client is innocent. While reports of missing children are not unusual -- a Haleigh and a Haylee are two recent examples -- several elements came together in the Caylee case to make it a high-profile news story, said Robert Thompson, who heads the Bleier Center for Television and Popular Culture at Syracuse University. "The fact that it's a toddler had that really dramatic, 'this is our worst nightmare' thing. It doesn't get any more dramatic than that," he said. "Then, of course, there's Casey herself." The 30-day delay in reporting Caylee's disappearance, along with the frequent release of police documents containing the personal details of the family's life, whetted the public's appetite. See how the case unfolded » . "By that time, it becomes self-fulfilling," Thompson said. "Once the story gets into the inbox of places that cover this thing -- Dateline, America's Most Wanted, Greta van Susteren, Nancy Grace, Geraldo -- it becomes a packaged drama. We want to know how it turns out.
New research by Missouri researchers finds job training programs, like those provided in most counties in Missouri, have paid off and provided positive returns for taxpayers. But there's also another side to the story. Some people at local technical colleges say less skilled people still aren't getting jobs in the industries where they're trained, and that in some cases the skills that have been learned will become obsolete anyway . Sheila Maguire is president of the Missouri Consortium of Community Colleges. She says skills need to be updated to match the specific needs of industries. Maguire: We started seeing a decline, really, in skill level of people who had been exposed to these programs. So it just caught us by surprise. The report also says the training programs often lack the standards that must be fulfilled for students to graduate. And even in technical colleges, those who can't pass the exams are often sent home. That has left some jobless. Maguire: We found really terrible consequences with those students who just didn't know what training they were actually getting and who then got a certificate that they either they didn't think they would get a job or they had to spend a year or two in some sort of program and then they ended up completely unemployable. Maguire says job training should be state-wide and needs a consistent, clear curriculum that includes basic job skills like writing and reading. That will make the programs more attractive to businesses and more successful at teaching skills to employees. Sheila Maguire, Missouri Consortium of Community Colleges: So the training isn't just for the industry. They've got to remember that that's what the training is for. It's for the employability of the students. So they're actually seeing that for the person who is receiving training and those benefits that we said would occur from that program. And so when people actually go and they've actually got a job in those industries and they're learning the skills that are needed for those industries . That's what we're all talking about here. Copyright 2016 by CNN NewSource. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.
This "new" debate actually reflects a question policymakers have asked for several decades: Does job training work? But is this the right question to ask? Experts project an increasing gap between workforce skills and employer needs. The gap is already pressing in some places and will worsen as the economy recovers. For example, in Cleveland, Ohio, manufacturers have had difficulty finding people with the English, math and technical skills to operate the high-tech machinery that today's jobs require. Worker skills are a critical ingredient in making any business go -- ask any small or medium-sized business owner, particularly in industries facing global competition. Other national governments invest a much larger portion of their GDP in worker skills. Training cannot erase the job losses we have seen in the past year, but done right it could build worker skills and help American businesses compete in the global economy. If we want to deal with the skills gap and put more Americans to work, then training is the only option. So the question is not whether training works, but rather what kind of training is most effective? So what's wrong with the way training works now? Our current approach is built on the idea that getting someone quickly into the workforce is the best first step. Today, the lion's share of public workforce training dollars is spent on short-term job readiness training -- basic computer skills, interview prep, and resume development -- rather than on industry-specific skills. Organizations that offer workforce services are typically funded to get people quickly into jobs, an approach to workforce development that was built during the high-employment '90s when it was much easier to find a job. In this economy, that approach is not working as well. But there is an approach that works better. Some organizations -- swimming against the tide of public policy and supported in large part by private philanthropy -- have developed an approach known as sectoral employment. This approach cultivates a deep understanding of local industries and employers and provides training that is closely tailored to their needs. At Public/Private Ventures (P/PV), we have just completed a rigorous evaluation of three such programs: one in New York's South Bronx that prepares people for jobs in the
Diego Tardelli scores the opening goal after just 28 minutes. The shot is one of the worst miss from the Argentinian star, but scores the opener. With Lionel Messi having been allowed to miss the first penalty of the tournament after drawing a foul from Miranda, when Alex Sandro was offside, world's most watched player also picked the worst time to miss another easy spot kick that was centimeters away from being the world's third worst miss after Rooney's miss against Algeria during England's 2010 World Cup and Cristiano Ronaldo's against Ivory Coast at the 2014 World Cup. The last time he scored a goal in this manner was eight years ago against England. Atletico Manati midfielder Diego Tardelli fires home the opener. Tardelli thought he was offside when his back met Dani Alves' cross, but was allowed the free header and fired a curling effort beyond Romero. The hosts got a second through Diego Tardelli after 14 minutes. Once again, a slip by Romero almost gifted Brazil the lead as his attempted clearance fell to Willian's feet, but with the Argentine keeper on top of him the Russian-born midfielder powered a shot high into the roof of the net from long range. Brazil goalkeeper Julio Cesar celebrates scoring with the crowd in Beijing. Substitute Eder scored with his first touch of the game 15 minutes from time to seal the win for the home side. An animated Luiz Felipe Scolari, who was in charge of Brazil on December 16, 2003 when Scolari's team staged their famous 5-1 win over Argentina in the FIFA South American Confed finals final, which was won by Germany, sat with his back to the bench in joy when Eder produced a cool finish from Neymar's layoff
Messi then had the chance to draw la Albiceleste level after Angel Di Maria was brought down in the box just before half time. But the Barcelona star's tame penalty was easily saved by Jefferson in the Brazil goal. An unmarked Tardelli put Brazil out of sight when he took advantage of yet more poor Argentina defending to nod in an Oscar corner after 64 minutes. While not a competitive fixture, the result marks Brazil's third consecutive win since its disastrous exit at the hands of Germany at the 2014 World Cup. A Selecao has made wholesale changes to its football operation since that 7-1 semi-final humiliation in July. Former midfield star and manager at the 2010 World Cup in South Africa, Dunga, has replaced Luiz Felipe Scolari in the dugout while players such as Kaka and Robinho have been recalled to the squad after missing out on the World Cup. Suarez makes international return . Luis Suarez returned to international football for the first time since biting Italy's Giorgio Chiellini at the World Cup in Brazil earlier this year and set up Uruguay's only goal in a 1-1 friendly draw against Saudi Arabia Friday. The Barcelona striker was initially banned from all football activity for four months and nine international matches. But an appeal to the Court of Arbitration for Sport saw the initial punishment altered to nine competitive internationals and allowed the 27-year-old to train with his teammates and take part in friendlies. Suarez's 47th minute strike rebounded off the post before being turned in to his own goal by Saudi defender Hassan Muath Fallatah. Substitute Naif Hazazi equalized for Saudi Arabia in the closing minutes to deny Uruguay victory.
Hashemi was arrested in 2011 as her father stood in the final round of the Iranian presidential election in June 2009. Hundreds of activists, intellectuals and others were arrested and put on trial as protests against alleged fraud in the election grew. The protests, which began in Mashhad in the central region of Isfahan and spread across Iran, fizzled out after their leader, Mir Hossein Mousavi, and his wife Zahra Rahnavard were put under house arrest in March 2010. Hashemi's lawyer, Mohammad Yousef, told Mehr News Agency that his client could appeal her sentence. Iran’s judiciary initially detained the daughter for about a month in February 2012 after police said she had tried to damage national security. Hashemi's arrest came weeks after her father, one of Iran's most powerful men, said Iran should change the constitution if people wanted reform. The former president is under house arrest in Tehran while he appeals a $2.7
In the past, Rafsanjani has been one of the government's most vocal critics. Rafsanjani served two terms as president from 1989 to 1997, and is still widely believed to be one of the wealthiest and most politically powerful men in Iran. He had long been a staunch critic and bitter political rival of Iran's President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad. Weeks after the 2009 elections, Rafsanjani condemned the regime's violent crackdown against the opposition movement and spoke out for the people's right to peacefully protest in a speech delivered at Tehran's Friday prayers. In recent months, Rafsanjani had toned down attacks and made statements of apparent support of the regime and the supreme leader, Ayatollah Ali Khamenei. Last March, Rafsanjani was replaced as head of Iran's Assembly of Experts, a powerful committee charged with electing and removing the leader of the Islamic Revolution and supervising his activities.
Please enable Javascript to watch this video The tournament is a powerful brand exporting one aspect of "Britishness" -- rain. And teddy bears, chicken sandwiches and -- unfortunately for those wanting to attend the day-long rain delay Thursday -- the increasingly rare one day of complete sunshine. For almost exactly four hours during the women's singles quarterfinal showdown against former world number one Caroline Wozniacki of Denmark the weather had been central to proceedings as the two-time Grand Slam champion made the sudden-death key break to go up 3-2 in the fifth set. But that changed abruptly around 10.20 a.m. and their match was halted. For any intending tennis fans at Wimbledon to have one more opportunity to cheer on Agnieszka Radwanska, Maria Sharapova or Simona Halep, the tournament had called an onsite news conference -- but only for half an hour. The All England Club did not specify why the women's quarterfinal match was interrupted, but it did say players and officials would be kept informed as to why matches are held up. Radwanska remained remarkably upbeat while waiting for the resumption. "Hopefully, things will be ok," Radwanska said. "I hope no one gets injured. But the bad thing was that we have lost this great win." For those following on "home turf" Wimbledon gave match alerts and a summary of the remainder of the day's action. The word came via live blog on the BBC while a representative of the Association of Tennis Professionals (ATP) and their MatchDay commentators stayed in touch on Twitter. Sometimes, however, one senses Wimbledon's most loyal fans might actually prefer the tournament to not take place. For the past 10 years, with no Prince William in sight, fans have been denied access to the Royal Box by the rain. Uncertainty over what the rain brings is nothing new. More than 200 years ago during the reign of Queen Victoria, Britain endured a drought that would drain entire swaths of Lancashire of its water. But in the '60s, after a rain storm just before the middle of the tournament stopped play for a day, the association that owns Wimbledon ensured all players were held in the locker room -- now closed -- rather than having to walk the two miles through towns on the outskirts of London in blizzards. In 1972, the first of Roger Federer's nine Wimbledon singles championships saw the retractable roof on Center Court -- that shut in 2011 during the rain -- despite the previous year's tournament being played under the same roof despite ongoing tennis legends and celebrities. Britain has played a major role in the success of Wimbledon over the decades. The 1929 eclipse, which saw Britain fail to win a singles championship title for the first time since 1911, was far from welcome. But the All England Club with its town centre setting still holds the place in Britian's hearts. There's no question it's the oldest tennis tournament in the world. It began in 1877; Novak Djokovic, a rising star currently ranked sixth in the world, hails its "tradition." Before there was a Wimbledon, American men won Wimbledon. From 1882 to 1926, a bevy of American men seized the trophy. They included John McEnroe, Bill Tilden, Ben Johnson, Bobby Riggs, Howard Tennenbaum, Don Budge, Harry Hopman, McHale Baxter, Jim Cash, Dorothy Round, Bill Tilden, Bill Rodgers, Tito Vilanova, Jim Courier, James Blake, Mark Philippoussis, Andy Roddick, Andre Agassi, Andy Murray, Roger Federer and a host of others who reached Wimbledon finals.
Royal regulations for Ascot's fashionistas . The quaint images and traditions of The Championship -- of regimented ball boys, pots of strawberries and cream, lines of well-mannered fans politely queuing for their tickets, players bowing or curtsying if the Queen is attendance in the Royal Box -- have become as ubiquitous as the tennis. Overseas players like Novak Djokovic cannot get enough of the tournament's history. "The great thing about Wimbledon that I really appreciate is the tradition that is respected and protected for more than 130 years," defending men's champion Djokovic declared yesterday on his Facebook page. "We still wear only white clothes during the tournament, and the defending champion always plays at 1pm on Monday!" And for the millions of people that will watch Wimbledon around the world -- and it is estimated that that the global TV audience could be as high as 500 million -- the tournament also reinforces what many think constitutes Britishness. "It has a David Niven-ish propriety (in that) it conforms to standards of behavior that were accepted ... at least during Niven's time (in the 1950s,)" explains Professor Ellis Cashmore, an academic and social commentator whose most recent work looks at whether Britain is losing the civility that it is famous for. "They still refer to 'Ladies' and the scoreboard [until recently] reads initials rather than Christian (first) names; the players have to wear white, and the match referee, not umpire, wears his club blazer. "So, there is an old-school sort of Britishness ... And we shouldn't forget the time-honored convention that Brits never win. Well, not since 1977, and not in the foreseeable future." Brand Britannia . Since that victory for Virginia Wade 35 years ago -- and you have to go back to 1936 and Fred Perry to find a British men's singles champion -- the story of Wimbledon has been one of sporting failure for its hosts. Yet the power of the Wimbledon brand to shape what the rest of the world thinks of Britain remains. "Wimbledon is a global brand: it's internationally recognized in a way that the U.S. Open and the French yearn for," explains Cashmore. "In terms of reach, Wimbledon runs the (English) Premier League a very close second. The name itself resounds like a thunderclap. There is nowhere on earth where you can just say 'Wimbledon' and people won't know what you're talking about. "It's like the BBC: an emblem of Britain that commands respect and admiration near and far. "But emblems are not necessarily accurate reflections of reality. they are representations, images or symbols of an ideal; a perfect place where people wear straw hats, eat fresh strawberries with their champagne and hobnob with the royal family." For social commentators like Peter York -- author of the famous "Sloane Ranger Handbook" -- Wimbledon represents a type of Britishness that doesn't exist any more: one steeped in glorious Empire that is overwhelmingly white, affluent and still centered around London and the south east of England. "Wimbledon mildly confirms that tennis around the world is quite a polite middle class game played in a very restrained way with a very restrained audience. People don't get into any fervor. That's for other proletarian sports," he says. "It's a middle class sport wherever you go ... It's all nice enough (and) reinforces British imagery but not create it. It's definitely a very southern (British) thing, a very southern suburb. It's a southern, well off, late Victorian suburb with a particular social character.
Liza Long was living in his parents' basement in Idaho when she posted a quick and dramatic post online that would go viral. Long, an anarchist soccer mom, a convicted arsonist who helped to blow up airplanes in the 1970s, and a woman who broke into Texas prisons to help free her brother, posted a dramatic last-minute plea online for help for her son, Michael. Michael, who suffers from schizophrenia, had been hospitalized for about a week and was in an acute care psychiatric facility, where he's getting treatment and medication, but his mother was worried. Michael was acting violently, had threatened suicide, and seemed "lost and kind of crazy." Nearly 140,000 people shared her post. Hundreds of reporters from all over the world sought to get in touch with her. Long sent CNN an email about the ordeal. CNN: What was it like over the last week? Long: I don't know that it's really been about the last week. The whole time I've been looking at this "Likelihood of Developing Childhood Malnutrition" thing in the sidebar of my blog, I've been trying to think about what it would take for them to call my kid a child who was in need of all the vitamins and minerals that a healthy child gets. That's always my initial concern. I really feel like I've spent a lot of time thinking about that and not thinking about myself. My biggest concern has been that nobody know that he needs care. The blog entry is extraordinary and just indescribable. What was the reaction on Reddit? I've received a ton of different commentaries from people. Mostly, people wanted to know my son's name and a short description of the condition. The reason that commentaries keep coming in is the response it generated for Michael and the mom. In the last 12 hours it's been the conversation that has made me think more about him and the services he needs to be in his best state. The conversations that are happening about his case have really been the windows into this community of young schizophrenics that I've really never seen before. And my son is such a sweet guy. For me to not want him to have to deal with the treatment he's in right now and to get to stay with me in Idaho -- hopefully in Idaho -- and live close to his friends (is going to be the best thing.) What's the most interesting feedback you've received? Everyone's response to this story has been really different in its intensity. I'm really glad that so many people have been concerned and reached out to us to say, "I'm having a hard time here. My nephew has the same disease." People don't have to take my commentaries too seriously. One commenter got in touch with me and said that my son's school was having issues with many other kids who have had their parents' medication taken. That story was one of the things that caused me to be more proactive, then think more about my own kid's health. But the most interesting response has probably been the reaction from the people whose children are going through the same situation as my son and are dealing with this largely unreported life-threatening disease that's existed for a lot of them. It's just been really heartfelt to see that people take this in. As a parent? I was honest with my son about his illness. I didn't lie about it. I didn't lie to myself about it. I probably wouldn't do that now, but I know what I'm letting him do right now. Were you prepared for all the attention? Being mentioned in a CNN story is amazing. I've never even thought of myself as being considered credible in the mainstream media. Not that I would have considered myself a part of the mainstream anyway.
A 40-year-old mother of four, Long teaches English at a small college in Boise. On Friday she posted a brutally honest essay on her blog, The Anarchist Soccer Mom. It struck a nerve in the wake of the mass shooting in which 20 children died at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Connecticut. Over the weekend, it seemed, everybody was sharing the post and talking about The Anarchist Soccer Mom. Then came the backlash, as others criticized her for committing her son and writing about it publicly. Read more: The backlash against 'I am Adam Lanza's Mother' For Long, the blog post was "a cry for help, a real gut-check article," she said, a way to articulate for friends the cold, gripping fear she has been living with for so long. She finally came to terms with an issue she'd been avoiding: Something serious is up with this boy. He goes into blind rages, he threatens violence and he is getting harder to control. She doesn't yet have a specific diagnosis, and she doesn't know what to do. "He's in a good mood most of the time," she wrote. "But when he's not, watch out. And it's impossible to predict what will set him off." Read the complete blog post . On Wednesday, Long followed a social worker's advice and committed her son to an acute care psychiatric facility. During an argument over whether he could wear blue pants to school, he had threatened to kill himself by jumping out of the car. It was a line she'd warned him not to cross. A few weeks earlier, she called police when he pulled a knife, threatening to kill her and himself when he was asked to return overdue library books. He was strapped to a gurney and taken to a hospital emergency room, where he eventually calmed down. During the argument over the pants, he threw yet another "full-blown fit," complete with screaming and hitting. "I hugged him close, so he couldn't escape from the car," she wrote. "He bit me several times and repeatedly jabbed his elbows into my rib cage. I'm still stronger than he is, but I won't be for much longer." A psychiatric commitment is Idaho's temporary solution, lasting 10 to 14 days. After that, she says, her only other option is jail or juvenile detention. A leap of faith is required when listening to Long's heart-wrenching story because confidentiality laws surrounding mental health issues make it difficult if not impossible to verify. But Long provided details, including the names of the hospital and her son's school program, and offered to make copies of ambulance and hospital bills available. Shooter's mother struggled to raise son, relative says . "No one wants to send a 13-year-old genius who loves Harry Potter and his snuggle animal collection to jail," she wrote in her blog. "But our society, with its stigma on mental illness and its broken health care system, does not provide us with other options. Then another tortured soul shoots up a fast food restaurant. A mall. A kindergarten classroom. And we wring our hands and say, 'Something must be done.'" Long says she has been told that her best option is to file criminal charges and build a paper trail. "It's just total, total frustration," she said over the phone. "Why are we doing this to the mentally ill? He's not a bad kid. He's a troubled kid. I just want to get help for my son." "Michael," as she calls him on the blog, is exceptionally bright, with an "off-the-charts IQ." But his temper had always gone far beyond the usual childhood tantrums. And his behavior grew stranger as he entered middle school. "If I could, I would wish my son into normalcy by sheer force of will," Long said. "I realized I was doing my family a disservice by thinking we were managing it.
Eight people are missing, officials say. The death toll has risen to 11, reports CNN affiliate IBN. Update, Tuesday, Oct. 4, 2016, 8:20 p.m. ET: Three more dead as heavy rain continues . After weeks of drenching rain, we might get relief. "In fact, that rainfall will likely be lighter and there will be less cloud cover," CNN meteorologist Pedram Javaheri said Tuesday afternoon. "This will allow the rain to taper off somewhat over the next several days." While we wait for the rain to cease, here's the latest: ------ Update, Monday, Oct. 3, 2016, 5:45 p.m. ET: Some government buildings and private residences, as well as structures that are accessible from outside the city, have been declared unsafe and the people working at those sites told to move to safer places. A few residents started moving from one home to another. Some who had to stay put were feeling nervous and anxious. "I just don't feel safe, any more. We are not quite sure what's going to happen," Basant Dashnagar, a resident who stayed in a building which the government declared unsafe, told CNN. -- [Breaking news update 4:37 p.m. ET] The death toll in Odisha state, where we are in the grip of a severe cyclone, has risen to four. Alerts were received from other states that the low pressure, or low storm, is headed towards the coast, said Guntur resident Gailada Das, who has been sharing updates on social media. -- [Breaking news update 4:33 p.m. ET] The central government's disaster management organization said the death toll had risen to four. The National Disaster Response Force (NDRF) was also rushing to the affected areas in Odisha state. -- [Breaking news update 4:22 p.m. ET] Government offices and schools in Odisha have been ordered to remain closed. -- [Breaking news update 4:19 p.m. ET] Thousands of people evacuated and officials expect more as heavy rains continue. -- [Breaking news update 4:13 p.m. ET] Odisha's Brihanmumbai Municipal Commissioner Ajoy Mehta said water logging has been reported in 16 subway stations in the city, across the country's financial capital Mumbai. -- [Breaking news update 4:07 p.m. ET] Two vehicles have been overturned in Vizag, a city on the northern tip of Andhra Pradesh state in Andhra Pradesh, it said. A cameraman from CNN news was reporting from that location on a trip that has been canceled, said Keshav Mohapatra, deputy managing editor of CNN Newsource. -- [Breaking news update 4:04 p.m. ET] "By tomorrow night it will be over the coast but it will still be very isolated, we have not started seeing heavy rains yet," said Bahadur Mahapatra, a meteorologist with the Meteorological Department in Bhubaneswar. One person died in Cuttack, the nearest city to Bhubaneswar, another in Nagercoil and another in Bijapur. -- [Breaking news update 3:59 p.m. ET] About 30,000 people are staying in 2,500 temporary shelters, the official news agency reported. -- [Breaking news update 3:52 p.m. ET] A team of rescue workers -- consisting of the Armed Forces, Navy, Coast Guard and fire-fighters -- is ready for rescue, relief and rehabilitation, according to the Press Information Bureau. ___ Copyright 2016 by CNN NewSource. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.
There have been at least four confirmed deaths from Tropical Cyclone Phailin, Amitabh Thakor, deputy inspector general of Brahmapur, Odisha, told CNN. Three were killed Saturday; a fourth was confirmed dead Sunday. Local police told CNN's sister network in India, CNN-IBN, that seven people had been killed by falling trees. [Last update at 10:24 p.m.] . In morning light, India assesses damage from Cyclone Phailin . (CNN) -- Morning light on Sunday revealed some of the damage from Tropical Cyclone Phailin, which made landfall on India's eastern coast as the strongest storm to hit India in 14 years. Power lines and trees were down and cars were overturned near the spot where the center of the storm struck the coast around 9 p.m. (11:30 a.m. ET) Saturday in eastern Odisha state, along the Bay of Bengal. Debris littered wet streets, roofs were torn off houses and windows on buildings were smashed in Brahmapur. Odisha's director-general of police, Prakash Mishra, told CNN that two men and a woman were killed by trees brought down by heavy winds in the state. Local police in Odisha told CNN's sister network in India, CNN-IBN, that seven people had been killed by falling trees. Hurricanes are known as cyclones in the Indian Ocean, and the wind speed at landfall -- 140 mph -- made it equivalent to a Category 4 hurricane. India evacuated more than a half-million people in advance of the storm, hoping to avoid a repetition of what happened 1999, when a cyclone claimed 10,000 lives. "We have taken a zero-casualty approach," said Odisha state disaster manager Kamal Lochan Mishra. "If people do not move, force will be used to evacuate them." Since Friday, Phailin has brought nearly 8 inches of rain to Odisha's capital of Bhubaneswar, about 30 miles from the coast. The city's average rainfall for October is 6.5 inches. The storm will continue to fall apart as it moves over land, but tropical-storm-force winds are still possible through early Monday, said CNN Meteorologist Judson Jones. Rainfall will also be a problem as Phailin moves up toward the Himalayas in Nepal. Multiple states in the region were under weather warnings for excessive rainfall and thunderstorms for most of Sunday and into Monday, Jones said. 500,000 people evacuated . Residents were evacuated to safer places in Odisha and the neighboring state of Andhra Pradesh, national disaster-management authority chief Marri Shashidhar Reddy said. More than 400,000 were moved to safety in Odisha alone, he told CNN. Many of those evacuated from low-lying coastal areas of Odisha left on foot or by bicycle, Kamal Lochan Mishra said. They are being housed in nearly 250 emergency shelters set up in sturdy buildings like schools and government offices. The Ganjam district of Odisha is expected to be the worst hit, with disaster preparedness efforts concentrated there, CNN-IBN reported. The India Meteorological Department warned of extensive damage to kutcha houses, those made of flimsy materials like mud and bamboo, as well as damage to old buildings. Power and communication lines are likely to suffer large-scale disruption. Extensive flooding will also disrupt rail and road traffic, and crops are likely to suffer major damage, it said. In Gopalpur, a coastal resort town in Ganjam, restaurants were shuttered and streets deserted Saturday afternoon, as rain lashed down.
The justices are expected to take on many of the issues raised in the cases , including "academic competitiveness," "affirmative action to favor women and minorities," "the meritocracy, and" perhaps, most of all, "The Race Card." Essentially, the court is considering whether a University of Texas admissions policy that accounted for race when considering applicants may have been unreasonable. Chief Justice John Roberts is one of the key questions now. "Why is it OK for the University of Texas to accept African-American and Hispanic applicants at the same rate as white applicants, but not OK for the University of Texas to admit white applicants at a significantly higher rate? It is simply different," the chief justice said in one of his questions to Texas Solicitor General Guy Cole. A hearing Monday focused on the importance of the questions underlying the cases, which could eventually settle the issue of whether affirmative action violates constitutional equal protection guarantees. Ninth Circuit Judge Andrew Kleinfeld provided some of the most startling answers in an extraordinary moment of speculation from the bench on the possible outcomes. Kleinfeld speculated that his daughter's admission to Columbia University, which also offers admissions that are "holistically based" on academic ability and community involvement, could be an example of a "post-racial" society. He suggested it would be more important to keep the nation's achievement gap within "the community of equality" than within "one small window of separation." Justices seemed to agree, as several accused the government of threatening traditional democratic values of equality and the right to vote. Reasonable officials can determine what the Constitution requires, but even if an "affirmative action" measure is ruled unconstitutional, the justices warned, there is an alternative. Justice Anthony Kennedy, who was often the swing vote in the 2012 presidential campaign, warned that limiting or ending the "stumbling blocks" of affirmative action policies could allow discrimination on a vast number of factors. He noted concerns were raised in the 1960s that segregation would benefit from affirmative action and not increase black and white school enrollment, and possibly undermine the goal of integrating classrooms in the long run. The impact of "students of color" on the U.S. educational system and society has broad implications, as well as the size of the number of white students allowed into selective schools. Arguments in April In 2013, the court will release decisions in "Race Card" cases, including Bakke vs. Regents of Univ. of Calif. and Regents of Univ. of Calif. v. Bakke. And, presumably, four more death penalty cases. Heman Marion Sweatt, a black public school teacher who lived in public housing in segregated Austin, filed the lawsuit in 1978. His children had received a general admission to UT. He claimed UT effectively turned away qualified white applicants by distinguishing between students that their admissions officials considered to be "of lower quality." In 1996, Abigail Noel Fisher, a white high school student from Sugar Land, Texas, filed suit. A lower court dismissed her challenge, but she won review by the appeals court, and the Texas Board of Regents also added its own legal brief. The board largely disagreed with the lower court, but said it would not interfere with UT's decision. The legal issues in the case have largely been the subjects of heated rhetoric and polemics around the country, and across the aisle in the Supreme Court. The case will be argued in April and likely a ruling will come in June. Some groups worry conservative majority will strike down or severely limit affirmative action. African-American and Hispanic organizations argue the Texas admissions program has transformed the school, bringing more minority students into the classroom. More than 200 legal briefs have been filed in the Texas cases. Will Roberts vote to revive affirmative action? The justices earlier turned away two separate appeals that same term over affirmative action, deeming them too narrow to "reasonably" be considered for high court review.
But it is the key difference between the plaintiffs that now confronts the court: Sweatt was African-American, Fisher is white. The justices are poised to rule this month in Fisher's appeal, possibly in coming days, on the use of race in college admissions. Sweatt's 1950 case produced a landmark court ruling that set the stage for the eventual end of racial segregation in public facilities. The question around Fisher could come down to whether a majority believes affirmative action has run its course, no longer necessary in a country that has come far to confront its racially divisive past. "There's a good chance that affirmative action, at least in the case of education, is on the chopping block," said Thomas Goldstein, a Washington appellate attorney and SCOTUSblog.com editor. Read selected quotes from arguments . "The Supreme Court 10 years ago approved the use of race as a factor. But it's just changed. [Now retired Justice] Sandra Day O'Connor isn't there and she was the decisive vote. And the current conservative majority is just very suspicious of the use of race in government decision-making," Goldstein said. Specifically in Fisher, do race-conscious admission policies at the University of Texas, the flagship state college, violate the rights of white applicants? Other, similar cases on docket . The timing of the decision is not lost on the justices. The court is also set to rule by month's end on two other contentious appeals over classification -- voting rights enforcement, and same-sex marriage. Fisher sued the state university after her college application was rejected in 2008 when she was a high school senior in Sugar Land, Texas, outside Houston. She claims the individualized, discretionary admission policies violate her rights, and favor African-American and Hispanic applicants over whites and Asian-Americans. The state of Texas provides for a hybrid admission policy: Automatic acceptance to its university's main campus in Austin for in-state students finishing in the top 10 percent of their high school class. Three quarters of the in-state student body gets in this way, which ensures a measure of non-subjective diversity. Fisher just missed that opportunity, so she had to compete in a separate pool of students seeking to attend the highly competitive school. It is that a selection process that is before the court. "If any state action should respect racial equality, it is university admissions," she and her lawyers told the high court in their written brief. "Selecting those who will benefit from the limited places available at universities has enormous consequences." The school, with a large 52,000 student body, defends the educational benefits of its . "holistic" policy of considering race as one of many factors -- including test scores, community service, leadership and work experience -- designed to create a diverse campus. "We must have the flexibility to consider each applicant's unique experiences and background so we can provide the best environment in which to educate and train the students who will be our nation's future leaders," said school administrators. A summary of major upcoming Supreme Court decisions . Obama administration backs school . The Obama administration agrees, and is backing the school, saying to grow a nation built on differing complexions and backgrounds will depend on future leaders "who possess the understanding of diversity that is necessary to govern and defend the United States." The NAACP Legal Defense and Educational Fund is among more than five dozen outside groups that filed legal briefs in support of the school. Many of them worry the conservative high court majority is poised to strike down or severely limit affirmative action. "A broad ruling could have very far reaching effects and could possibly affect the pathway to opportunity for minority students at a range of universities," said Debo Adegbile, the group's special counsel. "Not just at state universities, but at all institutions of higher education." But groups opposed to the state's policies think the time has come to rethink how affirmative action will be applied in the future,
First the controversy ended when India's women's magazine, Femina, ran a brief apology for showing the photo of the 30-year-old actress scantily clad in the December edition, which also featured topless shots of a Pakistani singer. Now the legal battle over the photo appears set to heat up. A lawyer for the reality TV star told the Times of India on Friday that Malik will "hold FHM 100% responsible for its online publication of the photos, so they will face consequences for doing so". The magazine's India's online edition has since been taken down. Related Articles UK lawmakers voice outrage over Veena Malik nudity pictures Veena Malik removed from Pakistan calendar Veena Malik accused of blasphemy Malik was officially forced to launch a defamation case in India through the Delhi High Court on Thursday over the FHM shoot. But the FHM India website has remained online. "FHM India in no way alters or alters the photo," the website says, highlighting a small part of the larger photograph altered by the magazine. "For Veena Malik, her characteristic tight outfits [were used] rather than one of her signature bikinis." "For her tattoos the legendary ISI," the website concludes. The website also clarifies that the magazine originally showed a set of ten pictures, which showed pictures of nine people. Some of the photographs and others of Veena Malik used to illustrate the feature were identified as unauthorized reproductions by Malik, who also had pictures of "visible testicles and penises in the past", according to court papers filed. The court ordered the magazine to remove a 2003 headline which said " Pakistani Teen Mom Veena Malik Would Make A Good Spy". Malik is a reality TV star and Muslim actress. She appeared in the Indian version of "Big Brother" last year. In a video clip of one of her other reality shows, which recently went viral on social media, she said: "When I was 18, 17-years-old, all my friends were moving away from Pakistan. I was even thinking about leaving Pakistan myself. We don't go out. We have too many curfews. People talk about religion, and it's really misunderstood," Malik said in a video of a reality show. Malik is not the first Pakistani woman to be featured in a Indian magazine without her clothes. In September last year, the actress Mahira Khan appeared on the cover of the Indian men's magazine, GQ, and at least one of the shots featured her topless. In 2012, Mahira Khan was found guilty in Pakistan for flashing her nipples on a television talk show, and a former singer married Shah Rukh Khan and showed off her bare breasts in a party to promote their Pakistani musical collaboration. "My goal in life is to appeal to both worlds," Malick Khan said at the time. 'So I will sue them' (CNN)
"I admit that I have done a bold shoot," she said, "but I was not nude. There is a big difference between topless and being nude. "You will see various shoots here in the Bollywood industry where the actresses actually went topless but they were covered like the way I was." In a telephone call with CNN, Malik said she had declined an offer a couple of months ago by an "international (media) agency" to pose nude for a fee but agreed to do a shoot for FHM India instead -- and without charges -- because it was a "personality" shoot. "What I have lost is priceless," she said. But FHM India says Malik knew the terms all along and approved the photos. The publication is even demanding a public apology and has threatened to counter-sue Malik for defamation. "She was completely aware of the cover," said FHM editor Kabeer Sharma. "She was completely aware of the concept. She loved the concept." Malik denies this. Lawyer Ayaz Bilawala told CNN that Malik is seeking $1.9 million in damages, saying the magazine "cheated" his client and doctored the nude pictures. In a legal notice served to the magazine, Malik contends that it was Sharma's idea for her to wear the painted on ISI tattoo; she was told it would be good for her image. In another photo, which was originally slated for the cover, she is shown holding a grenade in her right hand. FHM published the grenade photo inside, with a line plastered across it: "The cover we didn't use." Malik said the shoot was supposed to create positive feelings, not negative ones. She added that the controversy has affected her family, particularly her father. "He did not speak to me. He spoke to one of the media groups and like he was (crying), I mean he was too upset ... Okay I mean I don't blame him for that." But the actress and model is no stranger to controversy. She triggered uproar two years ago when she claimed that her former boyfriend, Pakistani cricketer Mohammed Asif, was involved in spot-fixing international matches. Asif was found guilty last month in an English court. A year later, the actress came under fire from Pakistani clerics who decried her behavior in the Indian reality TV show "Big Boss," as "un-Islamic." "I am not a perfect Muslim or a perfect person, but I haven't committed a crime, and unfortunately things like this are part and parcel of the industry I work in," Malik said. Still, she downplayed her criticism back home. "I am not bothered about what they think," she said. "My fans and many Pakistanis support me and believe (in) me." Harmeet Shah Singh reported from New Delhi and Shaan Khan reported from Islamabad, Pakistan.
Ted Lewis, Greenspan's fellow director of programming for CBS Sports, calls him "perhaps the preeminent sports filmmaker of the past half century." "I think his work encompasses the breadth of our common experience as sports fans," Lewis told CNN in a statement. "His movies will linger with us long after we've seen them." Greenspan, who started out as an interviewer, became known as the American Beatles of sports broadcasting and cinematography. He helped celebrate 10 American Olympians for their athletic feats. His latest film focused on the stories of 19 men, women and children -- some only children -- who received organ transplants from living donors. The group, which was known as the "Living Wallabies," traveled in an RV to Dallas for the 2014 National Transplant Games. Greenspan's first film, "Free at Last: The Story of Jackie Robinson," premiered at the Cannes Film Festival in 1951 and swept numerous awards, including an Academy Award. Greenspan quickly secured working relationships with major American sports leagues and pushed them to improve their practices. His award-winning documentary "The Boston Strangler" explored the role of organized crime in baseball. Lewis called Greenspan "an outspoken critic of corporate greed in sports, which he called sports entertainment in the greedy sense." Lewis also noted Greenspan's uplifting films about Olympic athletes overcoming tragedy and various other issues. "The whole thing is kind
His first documentary to attract widespread attention was his 1964 film, "Jesse Owens Returns to Berlin." That documentary -- and 21 other Greenspan films that made up the series "The Olympiad" -- garnered him an Emmy Award in 1976. Greenspan went on to make numerous other films including docudramas. He also authored several books about the Olympics. CNN was provided with an e-mail Beffa received from Norm Bellingham after he had been told of Greenspan's death. Bellingham is chief operating officer of the U.S. Olympic Committee and an Olympic gold medalist. "I am feeling a terrible loss," Bellingham. "I was just thinking of him this morning -- looking through the many Olympic stories and wondering how he picked the ones that he did and then sorted out how to tell them with such extraordinary power." In a prepared statement released Sunday afternoon, USOC chief executive officer Scott Blackmun said, "For more than six decades, Bud Greenspan has connected the Olympic Movement to everyday people in ways the founders of the Games couldn't have imagined." "While the entire Olympic Movement mourns the loss of a giant today," Blackmun stated, "his stories will continue to live on, carrying his passion for the Olympic Movement for years and years to come." CNN's John Branch contributed to this report.
The loya jirga -- meaning "grand assembly" in Persian -- was created by Karzai in the hope that it would resolve a serious division of ethnic power. Political heavyweights, including His Highness Qassim Jangalbagh Karzai (brother of Afghan President Hamid Karzai) and former foreign minister Abdullah Abdullah, attended. But it was the emergence of crowds of thousands of ordinary Afghans that were far more likely to influence the deliberations at the event. "It's really the Afghan masses," United Nations special representative to Afghanistan Zalmay Khalilzad said. "After the typhoon in the Philippines and the earthquake in Nepal this was the first mass protest. These days aren't so much about big names but rather about common Afghans. That's the only way we can overcome the challenges facing us." Loya jirga: Tribal event The loya jirga, according to the Afghan Constitution, is supposed to "summon members of the Afghan population" to resolve national and cultural issues. Originating during the era of the Taliban, the Afghan people's tribal gatherings have traditionally been more significant than the elections, usually held every five years. The move to host such a gathering had been decided upon after last year's loya jirga, when delegates gave a split vote -- with 114 favoring the presence
S. troops beyond next year. Amid some skepticism, they decided it was a good idea. U.S. Secretary of state John Kerry, who finished hammering out the deal with Karzai the day before the loya jirga began, was hopeful that they would. The assembly's decision is not binding, but Karzai has said he will follow their recommendation under one condition -- that U.S. forces do not conduct house raids. "If US military forces conduct military operations on Afghan homes even one more time, then there will be no BSA and we won't sign it," Karzai said Sunday. "They should give assurance about this to us before I sign it." Home raids have been one of the main sore spots between Afghans and Western military presence led by the United States. In spite of the broad backing, elders wanted to see one article changed. The current agreement gives the United States full jurisdiction over alleged crimes committed by the military on Afghan soil. Many at the loya jirga would like to see the cases prosecuted on U.S. bases in Afghanistan, so that victims and their families may have their say in court. CNN's Greg Botelho contributed to this report.
Through articles about Rodger in the past several days, many have expressed their deep sadness and sympathy for the victims. Some of those commented also mentioned the "Day of Retribution" part of Rodger's manifesto.Rodger, the son of a Hollywood director, stabbed to death three women at his sorority house before shooting six people to death in Isla Vista on Friday, police said. He then apparently shot himself.The victims identified as of 1:50 p.m. PST Tuesday: In the manifesto, Rodger details the back-and-forth he had with a group of girls his entire life, particularly when he attended high school in the San Fernando Valley of Los Angeles. He broke up with a girl named Katie once he became older and began a career. In his book, Rodger describes the women as beautiful. But in reality, Rodger says, they are disgusting, sick, and disinterested in him. "The only girls who showed interest in me were the beautiful ones," Rodger wrote. "But I had this overwhelming urge to hate them. 'They are monsters,' I kept saying to myself." He spent more than three years going to therapy before he went off to college."A lot of these girls have never even met a boy who's attractive, let alone to enjoy it like me. They've never even seen a boy's chest and abs, let alone even touched his penis," Rodger wrote. But he writes that he struggled with various other emotions. They included thinking about suicide, depression, and anger and fear."I remember how everyone tried to convince me not to do it," Rodger wrote. "They said that that's not how life is. But the dark cloud of being rejected and unwanted had completely overwhelmed me. I felt so alone, so unloved and unlovable, and I let my thoughts in a completely different direction." When Rodger started college, he said, the experience of having to get along with others was great, but then things changed.
" He also said he despised men who had luck with women and said he would eliminate them, too. "I will kill them all and make them suffer, just as they have made me suffer," he added. "It is only fair." On Friday, that "day of retribution" came. Authorities say Rodger, 22, fatally stabbed three men in his home before killing two women outside a sorority house and then shooting a man at a deli in Isla Vista, California. By the end of his rampage, six victims were dead. Rodger died of an apparent self-inflicted gunshot wound. And perhaps the only clues to the reasons are in the gunman's haunting dissertation of his life. A life-changing divorce . For most of his early childhood, Rodger was a happy boy. But he said his first major traumatic event came when he learned at 7 that his parents were divorcing. He described his parents' divorce as a devastating, "life-changing event," but said he gained more respect for his father after he quickly acquired a girlfriend. "Males who can easily find female mates garner more respect from their fellow men, even children," Rodger wrote. "How ironic is it that my father, one of those men who could easily find a girlfriend, has a son who would struggle all his life to find a girlfriend." Bitterness after puberty . But the impetus for most of Rodger's angst stemmed from his unfulfilled desires for women. "As children we all play together as equals in a fair environment. Only after the advent of puberty does the true brutality of human nature show its face," he wrote. "Life will become a bitter and unfair struggle for self-worth, all because girls will choose some boys over others. The boys who girls find attractive will live pleasure-filled lives while they dominate the boys who girls deem unworthy." He described himself as a very jealous person, "and at the age of nine my jealous nature sprung to the surface.
Twelve civilians also died in a Saudi airstrike in Jizan province, the Yemeni Interior Ministry tweeted. Another 22 civilians were killed and five women and a child wounded in an airstrike north of Hodeida City, Al Hashwa newspaper reported, citing Yemeni security officials. One Yemeni soldier was killed and 15 wounded in an airstrike on the coastal city of Hodeida, the Ministry of Defense reported. At least one person was also killed and 15 wounded in the northern district of Qatif al Sumwailah where a Saudi airstrike on a house caused a fire and some destruction, the Saudi-owned Al Arabiya satellite news channel reported. CNN also could not independently verify the reports of strikes and deaths. Terrorism comes just days after the Yemeni foreign minister announced the results of the country's presidential election. That vote
Information about what group the militants belonged to wasn't immediately available. This comes nearly three weeks after Yemen's government launched a military offensive against al Qaeda in the Arabian Peninsula. An al Qaeda explosives expert from the Russian republic of Dagestan, Tamoor al-Daghestani, was among those who were killed by security forces in the province of Shabwa, a military source said, according to the ministry's official newspaper, 26 September Net. Yemen's crackdown killed more than 60 suspected al Qaeda militants in the country from April 19 to April 21, Yemeni officials have said. Twelve more were killed on May 1, according to a high-level Yemeni government official. Operations last month included attacks by Yemeni commandos and suspected U.S. drone strikes, according to a Yemeni official.
While the smelly, blaring roaring engines of the world's busiest airport may not be the first thing that comes to mind when we think of great holiday journeys, apparently, it can be a major get-me-to-it blip for weary holidaymakers. A new installation in Heathrow's Terminals 1 and 2 hopes to alleviate the pain with a pleasing whiff. The Scent Globe is an olfactory installation combining essential oils from three individual destinations with the spare change from every passenger. Each of the 12 core scents takes its cue from one of the three destinations listed above, and the creators hope that by touching on these different regions, airport passengers will share fond memories of those destinations.
The globe, positioned in the newly opened Terminal 2, offers whiffs representing five nations -- Brazil, China, Japan, South Africa and Thailand. "These specially created scents will give passengers traveling through Terminal 2 an exclusive preview of destinations that only Heathrow connects to [from the UK]," says Normand Boivin, the airport's chief operating officer. So what do these countries smell like? Design in Scent, the team behind Heathrow's globe rely on complex odor infusions to bring them to life in a nasal-compatible form. 'Mystical temple incense' South Africa's fragrance "captures the adventure of safari with notes of tribal incense, wild grass and musky animalics through the scent of Hyraceum.
That's about 340 million more accounts than Yahoo disclosed in 2014, when it disclosed a breach that involved 500 million users. More importantly, the Times article suggests that the number of accounts may be higher than Yahoo's, the Journal reported Saturday. The new hack appears to have been orchestrated by hackers using stolen passwords from other sources, including a third-party analytics firm called Nice Systems. The hackers "may have already exchanged the passwords with other cybercriminals" before stealing those credentials and using them to break into email and social media accounts, according to The Wall Street Journal. We've always heard that passwords have become easy to crack, and it's true that hacking is often a result of human error, but security experts agree that passwords need to be extra secure. In 2013, (then) FBI director Robert Mueller made a speech in which he expressed concerns about password breeches. When an individual receives information about his or her personal information from other sources, cybercriminals may try to access that data. They will likely use malicious code to attempt to gain access to other people's personal information, such as banking information. Many of these scammers will focus on email accounts. Not only are bad actors interested in stealing information; hackers use information they discover to steal money. For instance, e-mail scams that claim that you've won a free iPhone or a new credit card may look quite legitimate, but what they really want is your personal information and your banking passwords. So where should users take precautions to protect themselves? Corey Sanders is the managing director of the Isec Review Services Division at Bit9, an Australian security company. Email and social media accounts "are two of the most popular targets of all because there's so much information stored in there. User names for Facebook, LinkedIn, Twitter, personal accounts, they have all of the information on it. Social media, the same goes for people," Sanders says. He says it's important for users to update their anti-virus software regularly and be mindful of what questions they use to sign in to their accounts. "If you use your name and your photo, you would also be on the list," he says. Sanders recommends using different passwords for different services. He also suggests to minimize the risk of being targeted by hackers by changing your passwords often and to never save your passwords in email. Many passwords include information such as your birth date, or your name, or your family names, because people often use the same passwords across multiple accounts. "If it's the same password, it can get stolen so quickly," Sanders says. He also recommends that users review their passwords regularly. "Change the password for the service or the software and you may have some other protection that's available, where that person has to go to their home computer to have that set up," he says. The-CNN-Wire ™ & © 2015 Cable News Network, Inc., a Time Warner Company. All rights reserved.
The article says that a Russian cybercrime group by the name of CyberVor has amassed this astoundingly large number of credentials from upwards of 420,000 distinct web sites. My immediate response was: Yeah, so? In the context of the story it would seem that countless passwords are now known to this criminal group, and we should be panicking and changing all of our passwords. But wait a minute. Hold Security, the company that found this hack, may have a commercial interest in this reaction. Hold Security offers to tell companies if their usernames and passwords were compromised for the princely sum of $120. Arguably, Hold Security stood to make more money out of this story than the Russian hackers themselves. Rather than go down the rabbit hole, let's focus on what this really means and how we should react. While 1.2 billion is a big number, it appears that many of these credentials could have been obtained from previous large-scale breaches such as Adobe, Sony, LinkedIn, RockYou.com and eBay. The totals from these sites alone adds up to close to half a billion. We can also assume that many of the 420,000 hacked websites were Mom and Pop blogs, forums and other places where people often consider using a "throwaway" password. The concept is that things like your email, social media and bank require secure, unique passwords. But all the other junk in our lives can just use a simple, less secure password. The criminals don't have the passwords in most cases. They have cryptographic representations of the passwords known as hashes. These hashes come in a lot of varieties with varying degrees of security associated with them. The purpose of a hash is to slow down an attacker from being able to acquire your password if a password database is stolen. This hashing is most effective if you follow good security practices, like not using dictionary words, and making sure to include numbers and symbols in your password. People in general are bad at choosing passwords. That means hashing is often only a speedbump for a determined attacker. But the hashes bring out the truth of the matter. The criminals don't necessarily even have your password. They have a hash that could result in them discovering your password, especially if it is poorly chosen like password123 or qwrtyasdfg. Many of these stolen hashes may have been obtained some time ago, which means they are less useful to the crooks now. Of course, we don't know the truth and can't analyze what is known because Hold Security is trying to figure out how to monetize the knowledge, leaving even the experts a bit in the dark about how serious a discovery this truly is. My advice? Keep calm and carry on. It is always a good practice to use strong passwords and different passwords on the different sites we use and change them if we have reason to believe they might be compromised. There are many tools available to assist with automating this task, making it only a
Faced with a difficult decision, Yan decided to try selling her surplus breast milk to ease some financial burdens. Once she realized she'd found a viable market, Yan started a "the business of selling spare breast milk." It's a process similar to an informal business enterprise, she said. Eventually, some may make a profit while others will lose a small portion of their breast milk . Wholesale milk broker reports pregnancy inflation in China Farmers in China commit suicide over hazy milk crisis The need for feed is the only reason why Yan sells her breast milk. "With and without the business of selling breast milk, my baby is all I need," she said.Part of the personal responsibility of parenting, she adds, is understanding how much is left over. According to Yan, about 40 to 50% of mother's milk floats free due to a lack of milk in their breast milk glands. As a result, over 50% of newborn babies in China are hospitalized for ingesting breast milk in their early months, according to health authorities.When Yan learned about the growing demand for breast milk in China , she decided to sell the breast milk she could not supply to local families. Her motive isn't a profit, it's simply to help babies that do not have a mother or grandmother nearby to breastfeed them. Due to the lack of trust from authorities, Yan refuses to reveal how much breast milk she can actually supply. Once she's guaranteed sales, she will continue. Yan is not the only mother selling her breast milk online. During the second half of last year, there were 1,347 registered sites on Weibo, China's version of Twitter, according to CNN analysis.It appears that the government is a little more willing to acknowledge the problem of surplus milk supply."Regulated milk powder production and quantity are very limited and no longer very profitable," a pediatrician from the Wangfujing Pediatric Hospital in Beijing told CNN. "But feeding has to be a two-way street. I understand how mothers want to sell their milk, but we are required to not allow the practice."In a city such as Beijing, with more than 30,000 babies born each year, some women make a career out of selling breast milk."Mothers in Beijing are much more willing to sell their milk than mothers in other cities," Yan, from Liaoning, said.Although the government is not clearly going after these small-scale breast milk sellers, it is decreasing regulation and popularity. In early 2016, China began requiring parental groups to register all donation of breast milk with the government.That still leaves Yan who is able to supply some of the growing demand for breast milk in China."If you ask me what kind of life my baby would be living without my breast milk, I will not be able to tell you," she said.
"I don't want to waste my milk," she told CNN. "I heard that others sell breast milk online, and I thought 'Why not sell mine?' I created a Web page and started my business." A cursory search for "breast milk" on 58.com, a Chinese online shopping platform, reveals no shortage of mothers offering to sell their breast milk. From Shanghai to Guangzhou, nursing mothers are cashing in on this booming online trade. "I just need to wait for calls," said Yan. "I provide fresh and frozen breast milk. But you have to pick it up yourself." According to Yan, the market price is around 5,000 RMB (US$814) for a month's supply. In contrast, a month's worth of conventional baby formula costs around 2,000 RMB (US$325) in China. After China's tainted milk powder scandal in 2008, many new mothers who were unable to produce enough breast milk for their infant resorted to buying formula overseas â€” most notably in Hong Kong. However, earlier this year Hong Kong introduced limits on the amount of milk powder travelers can take out of the territory, over concerns about shortages and a "black market" in formula sold at vastly inflated prices. The restrictions have encouraged new mothers to find other means of sourcing milk to feed their babies. "If I don't have enough breast milk I would prefer to purchase human breast milk, because I don't trust our milk powder," explained Fang Lu, a newlywed who is planning to start a family. This week, the mistrust of milk powder extended to the biggest single supplier of dairy products to China. On Saturday, New Zealand company Fonterra announced that a strain of bacteria that causes botulism had been found in batches of an ingredient used to make baby formula, as well as sports drinks. China immediately halted imports of Fonterra-produced Whey Powder and Dairy Base powder, and increased inspections of New Zealand dairy products. Some mothers may be turning to others' breast milk as an "safer" alternative but health experts say it doesn't come without risks. According to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, babies fed unscreened milk from other mothers could be exposed to infectious diseases, including HIV, and illegal and prescription drugs. It adds that, if not stored properly human milk, "like any type of any type of milk, becomes contaminated and unsafe to drink." In May, China opened its first breast milk bank at the Guangzhou Maternity and Childcare Hospital and just last week another opened in Nanjing, Jiangsu province. However, like others around the world, they impose strict controls on who is able to donate, limiting the availability of supply. The trend of mothers' buying human milk online is not limited to China. A number of sites exist online to match buyers and sellers. Separately, an increasing number of women are turning to informal milk sharing sites that trust donors to properly store their milk
Powell had experienced some problems with his hamstring and the problem has now continued to affect him during training. "I have to correct my schedule and unfortunately I am not ready to do the 100m at the world championships," he said. "The doctor has prescribed two weeks recovery, but the problem with my hamstring has prevented me from properly training." Powell last ran over 100m last November and has competed only in a few races since that time. Also on Friday, Bolt was having another medical examination to determine whether or not he will be fit to run, says a statement on the IAAF website. "All the tests on this leg have come back negative and I have done regular exercises on this leg without any bad results," he said. Copyright 2015 by CNN NewSource. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.
78 second run in Lausanne, but a statement from his management company confirmed he will be absent from the biennial event with a groin injury. "Asafa Powell has officially withdrawn from the 100m event in Daegu citing a continued groin strain," read the statement. "Powell suffered a groin strain in Budapest on July 30 and has had recurring tightness and pain ever since. "After Budapest, Asafa missed eight days of training before he could attempt to sprint again. When he returned to the track he was able to sprint but it caused the groin to flare up. Despite missing out on the individual event, Powell could be part of the Jamaican 4 x 100m relay squad which claimed gold in Berlin and also at the 2008 Olympic Games in Beijing. "He has received all sorts of treatments over the past two weeks in the hope of being prepared to run the 100m here in Daegu," continued the statement.
A native of Montana, Mihok grew up in the U.S. border town of Nogales. The town served as a particularly tough place to make it as an American in his youth, and there is a body of evidence that Mihok developed an intense fear of heights. He first garnered Hollywood's attention in 1996's "Romeo + Juliet." Raised in the City of Angels by a single mother, he had neither of his two older brothers with him, and found himself ostracized at school -- "Everybody was using out sexier nicknames than my [gang name]," he says -- so he enrolled in the arts program at North Hollywood High School, a type of school that few white, mostly Mexican American students chose at the time. This alone provides a curious precedent for "Ray Donovan," Showtime's series following the titular character (Liev Schreiber) as he helps land big name clients for LA's largest "fixer" firm, a dirty do-gooder job he was formerly involved in as well.
It's an impressive career for anyone trying to break into show business, but Mihok makes it more impressive with his revelation: He was diagnosed with Tourette's syndrome at age 6. CNN spoke with Mihok in Lakeland, Florida, where he was speaking out against bullying at schools in connection with Jaylen's Challenge. The following is an excerpt of that interview: . CNN: What was it like for you, at 6 years old, when you first started experiencing symptoms of Tourette's? Dash Mihok: My first tic was to shake my head violently. I was in karate class, and I was shaking violently. All of a sudden, I just started to notice that the teacher was looking at me, and all the kids were wondering what I was doing. I suddenly felt really strange. It was the experience of knowing that you're doing something and that you have to do it. It's impossible to stop, and that's very unnerving, no matter what age you are. You're scared, you're interested, you're wondering: "What is this that's happening
For the past few months, the company's IPO has been public knowledge. Reports on how Facebook plans to handle the IPO have had headlines printed in the Wall Street Journal and financial news publications. So why is it so hard to imagine that perhaps some Facebook employees will want to hold back on selling their shares? No one at Facebook is going to keep their money on a secret, but speculation about whether Facebook employees will or won't sell shares after the company goes public is like speculating on the price the company will sell its shares for and how much it will raise. The goal of these speculations is to make the insiders -- particularly employees who will be the first to sell -- richer, of course. But considering all the people who won't be able to sell, there will certainly be less money to be made by Facebook employees than there were before the company filed for its IPO.
They are just like any other group of employees -- wildly diverse in their actions, thoughts, interests, desires, obligations and behaviors. In other words, they will behave like individuals. Sure, there will be luxury purchases. Some will buy stunning homes and others will buy fancy cars. There will be those who squirrel the money away for later use or invest in long-term projects. If history is any guide -- just think of Microsoft -- there will be those who start charitable foundations or give directly to existing nonprofits, educational institutions or organizations tied to a variety of causes. Some will ultimately choose the time-honored Silicon Valley tradition of using the spoils from one successful start-up to fund a fleet of new ones. But what makes Silicon Valley different from other places -- particularly Wall Street -- is that those who are made rich by their jobs tend to be, on average, circumspect about displaying their wealth.
Hours after Treasury Department Treasury Secretary Tim Geithner returned from a trip to China at the weekend, he said China and Europe needed to take firmer measures to tackle their dependency on Iranian oil. "We have to see more of what's happening on the supply side, the fact that these traders are doing so much -- they're exporting so much -- that they are using EU diesel and Chinese gasoline. "They're not helping the Europeans or the Americans get more fuel out of Iran. "We continue to urge Asian nations, including China, and Europe to take the necessary steps to get this Iranian material out of their country. It's just not productive. "We're trying to get countries, including China, to stop doing business with these refiners to keep any of it out of Iran -- to keep it out of Iran's hands and to cut off their financial infrastructure so they can't support Iran's nuclear program," Geithner told BBC's World at One. It appears that Washington is ramping up the pressure on EU and Chinese firms using Iran as a trading platform in its effort to bring Iran and the international community back to the negotiating table to end Tehran's nuclear program. Since Iran signed the agreement with the six world powers on the July 14, deal, its energy exports have dwindled, with nearly half its oil exports out of the country since the end of August, according to Iranian Ambassador to China Mehdi Honardoost.
The US State Department called the sanctions against the three firms an "important" step in convincing Iran to change its behaviour, and highlighted the "potential connection between Iran's revenues derived from its energy sector and the funding of its proliferation [of] sensitive nuclear activities." A spokesperson for Zhuhai Zhenrong said the company had not sold gasoline to Iran. "We've never exported a barrel, not even a wee bit of refined fuel to Iran," said Zheng Mei, director of the public affairs department. According to the statement, the three firms violated US restrictions on supplying Iran with refined oil products that were passed in 2010. "Under the sanctions imposed today, all three companies are barred from receiving US export licenses, US Export Import Bank financing, and loans over $10m from US financial institutions," the US State Department said. Importing refined oil products like petrol and diesel is crucial for Iran's economy because the country doesn't have sufficient refining infrastructure to process enough of its own crude into products. China is the biggest buyer of Iran's crude oil and, according to the US State Department, is also a significant source of gasoline for Iran, but Chinese companies have until now avoided sanctions from the US. China supported the most recent United Nations sanctions resolution on Iran in 2010, and some analysts believe that in exchange for that support the US may have turned a blind eye to Chinese companies which may have violated US laws.
The wide-ranging changes that would occur once Bergdahl, a prisoner of war in Afghanistan, left his prison were being talked about as something dramatic. It was America's first prisoner of war free in more than a decade. During the course of the 15 months that he was held, May 2014 through September 2015, the red-brick, century-old German stone Victorian home where he grew up was also rocked by the fighting in Afghanistan and often shorn by war. A sergeant had died by this point, and others became hostages. Many in Hailey thought about how Bergdahl could be saved. But he left, and the rest is history. The central location in his hometown now seems disconnected, and as one woman put it Thursday, she doesn't even know what she is. "Something has happened here ... and I don't think it's complete and I don't think it's healed here yet," said Tracy Swandean, owner of Sweetwater Web Design. Swandean, in her 20s, was the first high school graduate from Hailey's Bergholz Elementary School. She says she's walking in the streets without a care and not much beyond "normalcy." She's worried about what her now-adult son will think of the town she and her parents helped bring to life -- except for the stained memory of Bergdahl's capture, the redbrick main street streets plastered with goodbye banners, and the tattoos of statues depicting Jesus holding a Bible and a sword. "It's a message of ... 'We're pulling together'," she said. "For it to happen at the same time does make you feel like you're in a holding pattern, you know? You want to be doing so much more. And it's just so challenging, but there is an excitement about what's happening in town." As it turns out, there are more members of Bergdahl's family living in Idaho than did his parents. A red sports utility vehicle was parked in his parents' driveway as Swandean spoke to CNN, and a woman said the last time her mother saw her, it was in a police station holding a bunch of documents. Locals are relieved his ordeal is over, but are concerned about his health and well-being. They don't know exactly what Bergdahl has been told, but they know the public isn't interested in details. Meanwhile, most of the town's attention is focused on the orange park benches with that splash of red, several municipal buildings marking Bergdahl's homecoming, and the buoyant greeting he got from some who greeted him at the gate. "I understand the fight for his release. I understand the anger that's out there from the (National Security) Council," said Ken Garcia, assistant county prosecutor in nearby Independence. "He's come back to American soil. He shouldn't be questioning the constitution." No legal action has been filed yet, but Garcia added "there's no reason to think it won't, and nothing prevented anybody from doing so if they chose to do so." Mayor Karlin Peterson-Green says the town will "overcome" the sorrows that need to be made, but there's not much the town can do with Bergdahl when he's serving time. He doesn't foresee the town, town hall, the Hailey Recreation District, or even his few teachers from his high school years wanting to step in and any legal action, even to vindicate Bergdahl, wouldn't be appropriate. "If the town of Hailey or somebody wants to put a resolution forward, we'll be more than willing to sit down with him and come to some resolution on the things that need to be put in place," Peterson-Green said. "We're ready to let this be done with, that's our point. We're ready to move on. Because right now, everything is moving forward." The few windows on the gray-brick garage Bergdahl built there will now have closed flaps. The tank was moved to the scrap yard. The rain is now sitting outside, dripping away from a puddle that continues to develop over the concrete walkway. Time moves so fast when everything is moving forward. He is home now.
But more than four months after Bergdahl returned to the United States, the ribbons and banners are gone. This town's relationship with the saga of their homegrown prisoner of war is complicated. "We're done. We're over it," Hailey Mayor Fritz Haemmerle said as he denied CNN's request for an on-camera interview. "We stood by the Bergdahl family to get Bowe home but we need to move on." Inside a secure locker of the Hailey Police Department, there are boxes filled with thousands of letters for Bergdahl. The letters were sent to the White House as part of a "Bring Bowe Home" campaign started through social media last November, just months before Bergdahl would be released. Stefanie O'Neill, a Bergdahl family friend, spearheaded the letter campaign. In three months, O'Neill said, several hundred thousand letters poured into the White House. A few of those boxes were eventually shipped to Idaho. O'Neill can't bring herself to throw the letters away. "It means that people all over the world cared about Bowe," O'Neill said. "We would hope that he would like to read through them one day to see just how much he meant to so many people." The boxes are a symbol of how the story of Bergdahl's rescue didn't come with a triumphant homecoming. Bergdahl's release on May 30 was instantly doused in controversy. Many of the soldiers who served with him accused the 28-year-old soldier of deserting his unit by walking off the Afghanistan base before he was captured. There was also intense criticism of the Obama administration for trading Bergdahl for five Taliban prisoners held in Guantanamo Bay, Cuba. Bergdahl now sits in a sort of limbo. He has completed the Army's formal reintegration program and continues psychological treatment. He is still assigned to a unit with U.S. Army North in San Antonio, performing "administrative duties." But Bergdahl is also waiting to hear if he'll face any criminal charges in the military justice system. In August, he was questioned by Gen. Kenneth Dahl for two days. The Army announced on Friday that Dahl completed the initial report on his findings in the Bergdahl case. The report will now be reviewed by the director of the Army staff and senior Army leaders. "This will be a lengthy process," an Army spokesman wrote. "It would be inappropriate to speculate on the potential results or the amount of time the review process will take to complete." When news of Bergdahl's release broke, his family and friends had hoped for a quick reunion. For nearly five years, the lives of Bergdahl's parents had been consumed by the plight of their son. His father, Bob Bergdahl, has said he kept his clocks set to the time in Afghanistan. He grew a beard, to the dismay of many critics, to show solidarity with his son. Bob Bergdahl also taught himself Pashto, the language of his son's captors, to communicate directly with the Taliban. In the days after his son's release, critics used those details to accuse Bob Bergdahl of sympathizing with the Taliban. Bergdahl's parents have declined all requests for interviews. Family friends say Bob Bergdahl has shaved his beard. But the expected family reunion never materialized and the Bergdahl family soon stopped answering questions about why Bowe Bergdahl was refusing to see his parents. Sources tell CNN that Bergdahl is now "communicating" with his parents, but a face-to-face reunion still has not occurred. The sources would not elaborate on how Bergdahl is communicating with his family. Military officials have said Bergdahl has been given every opportunity to reunite with his family. Bergdahl's attorney, Eugene Fidell, declined to talk about Bergdahl's communication with his family. Bergdahl grew up among a tight-knit community of families in Hailey that home-schooled their children. Tim Kemery's son was one of Bowe's best friends. Kemery said Bowe Bergdahl was raised in an intensely religious atmosphere with a strict code of conduct.
CLUB RESULTS AC Milan (2) vs. Werder Bremen 1: 1-2 FULL-TIME RANGERS 0 HNK RUSSIA 2 GET OUT OF MY WAY EPIC Ten man Real Madrid opened up a three-point gap over bitter rival Atletico Madrid after dispatching La Liga newcomers Espanyol at the Bernabeu on Saturday. The convincing win also gave coach Carlo Ancelotti the chance to give his new look team some much-needed rest after being struck down by injuries this week. European champions Real are two points clear of Malaga atop the table after their second straight win over Espanyol, the Catalan side having lost all three of their previous meetings against the Spanish giants. They weren't flattered by the result, with Ronaldo netting what ended up being the only goal of the first half when he raced onto a Bale through ball and fired the ball home in the 16th minute. James, a former Espanyol player, then put the home side firmly in charge in the 36th minute, sliding in to convert a cross from Cristiano Ronaldo into the near corner of the net, giving former Espanyol striker Rodriguez his first ever goal for Real. James twice threatened to score again before Bale, who scored the opener, grabbed his first goal for the European champions in the 68th minute, beating goalkeeper Pau Lopez with a shot that cannoned in off the post after the diminutive winger latched onto Marcelo's dangerous cross. It was a mixed day for Real players linked with a move away in the summer, with Gareth Bale looking subdued and Ronaldo booed by the Bernabeu crowd after failing to feed compatriot Marcelo in the lead up to the first goal. Last summer Ancelotti paid up to €60 million ($80 million) to convince Bale from Tottenham to become the most expensive player in football history, and in his first two starts for Real since his summer move he has failed to show enough spark to justify such a high price tag. It's not hard to understand his disappointment. The Welshman was impressive, indeed unstoppable, in a two-match debut against Atletico Madrid. He played his part in the vital 2-1 win over their fierce rivals, as did his new team-mates after losing to Valencia in midweek. This weekend
Portuguese full-back Fabio Coentrao was sent off for Los Blancos at the beginning of the second half. However, Espanyol couldn't take advantage of its numerical advantage. Instead, substitute Nacho Fernandez added a third for Real 15 minutes from time. It could have been even more had Bale made more of a chance when put through on goal before Nacho sealed the win. But the Welsh winger failed to square the ball to Cristiano Ronaldo who appeared to be in a better position to score. That led to jeers from the home crowd which didn't appreciate the $132 million man's selfishness in front of goal. Yet  after the game, Real boss Carlo Ancelotti was quick to defend Bale when speaking to reporters. "Bale played a very good game. He had intensity, he scored, he helped in the first goal," said Ancelotti in quotes carried by the AFP news agency. "It could be in this moment the fans asked for a pass to Cristiano that he didn't make because, like all strikers in front of goal, they try to score. "We have fans that demand a lot and this is good. Bale is a fundamental player like Cristiano and that is why the fans demand more of them." The result means Real move four points clear at the top of the La Liga table, although that lead will be reduced by either second-placed Barcelona or third-placed Atletico Madrid which face off against one another in the Catalan capital tomorrow evening. Looking beyond that, Ancelotti will be seeking harmony in the squad as Real prepare for the second leg of their Copa Del Rey last-16-tie against city rivals Atletico on Thursday. Atletico triumphed 2-0 in the first leg at the Vicente Calderon last week and Real haven't beaten them in three attempts this season. "We have time to prepare well," Ancelotti said. "We'll play our strongest team because we want to turn around the result of the first leg and try our best to get to the quarter-finals. "I think everyone is waiting for this game. It is difficult for us but we are going to play our best and playing at home will help us."
"The aviation industry largely believes that an experienced professional pilot might have made that same turn, but it's more likely a (newly licensed) pilot," Bob Goyer, technical advisor to a group of aviation consultants, said in an interview Wednesday. "Only a professional pilot, or someone with a number of years of experience flying multi-engine long-range aircraft of a similar size and type to this, could program those particular route pathways, so that they changed, as it were, at random?"... According to the Aviation Safety Network , a network of aviation accident investigators, there have been five cases in the past 15 years of airplanes flying at their intended flight path after being intentionally or unintentionally diverted in this way. In these cases, both pilots were still on board at the time and were found dead. -- All major crashes involving MD-83s occurring since January 1999 -- 5 This story has been updated since its original posting on Monday July 1, 2015.
Investigators now believe, according to news reports, that after its transponder and ACARS radio were turned off, turns were initiated at GPS waypoints. These waypoints are essentially virtual checkpoints in the sky, defining markers charted by airspace regulators that create pathways in the air that airplanes follow to keep safely separated from each other. The waypoints are defined by an exact latitude and longitude and can be located by a number of the airplane's various navigators, including GPS. If the reports of the flight path are true, it is not a route that could happen by accident. There are two ways the 777-200 could have flown on this path. After passing one waypoint, it could have been directed to fly to the next waypoint by a pilot turning the heading knob toward that exact place, a process that would require some piloting expertise. This would be very unusual, and a novice or pilot without much flying experience on this plane would not know to make these kinds of inputs or have
Since early February, editorial staffers at Guns & Ammo, a leading firearms publication, have had to decide whether to "ignore the passionate voices of tens of thousands of readers, or to listen to the threats and negative messages of extremists and extremists," Bequette wrote in his apology. In the end, Guns & Ammo "responded as the magazine should," he said in his resignation letter. However, he resigned Tuesday because the magazine was "remaining silent on this issue -- and that's simply inexcusable." "We may not be your favorite publication, but I do know that we don't preach to our readers or shirk responsibility to them," Bequette wrote in his resignation letter. "I won't be accused of that anymore. I will now adhere to that same principle moving forward." The strongly-worded resignation letter comes in response to the online uproar that followed the publication of an editorial by Dick Metcalf, an editor and writer for the magazine, advocating gun control. Metcalf ran excerpts from his essay, titled "Seize the guns," for the magazine's December issue. “There’s a race to the bottom going on in America in this regard, and we as a society owe it to the victims to stop it. We all bear a responsibility,” Metcalf wrote. In addition to asserting that "legal assault weapons, once common to our streets, appear now mostly on the streets of Third World countries," Metcalf went on to lay out some possible regulations. "There is plenty of legislation -- both the strict and the ambiguous -- that could be applied to make Americans safer,” Metcalf wrote. “However, it’s time to share the burden. We need to pass laws to ban the sale and possession of these deadly weapons that have no business on American streets." Former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani, the head of an organization that advocates expanded firearms regulation, has criticized the comments. "His position is that because the (so-called) AR-15 has a killing capacity, it's OK to have more than one," Giuliani said last week, according to the New York Daily News.
Bequette also fired Metcalf, a gun writer who had written the Firearms Law column for the magazine's sister publication, Shooting Times. Metcalf couldn't be immediately reached for comment. Opinion: Gun control is not the answer . In his recent commentary, Metcalf wrote about how "way too many gun owners still seem to believe that any regulation of the right to keep and bear arms is an infringement" prohibited by the Second Amendment. "The fact is, all constitutional rights are regulated, always have been, and need to be," Metcalf wrote. After a readership uproar, Bequette said his magazine has an "unwavering" commitment to the Second Amendment. "In publishing Metcalf's column, I was untrue to that tradition, and for that I apologize," Bequette wrote in a column dated Wednesday. "I made a mistake by publishing the column. I thought it would generate a healthy exchange of ideas on gun rights. I miscalculated, pure and simple. I was wrong, and I ask your forgiveness," he continued. Plans were already in place for a new editor to take over the magazine on January 1, but that new editor, Eric R. Poole, who ran Guns & Ammo's special interest publications, was installed immediately, Bequette said. State battles intensify on access to guns . Among the comments generating discussion on the magazine's Facebook page was Trace Simek's declaration that he was canceling his subscription and boycotting parent firm InterMedia Outdoors, which describes itself as "the premier outdoor sports-oriented media group in the United States." Wrote Simek: "It takes more than one Elmer Fudd to get a pro-gun control agenda editorial in the pages of a formerly-relevant national firearms industry publication: your apology rings false, and smacks of having been cobbled together as a reaction to an unexpected deluge of negative sentiment." Gary Graf said he feared the column would energize gun control efforts -- what he called the anti-Second Amendment crowd. "Publishing Metcalf's back page read was like throwing a bucket of blood in shark infested waters, especially here in California," Graf wrote.
by WorldTribune Staff, June 24, 2015 The U.S. Supreme Court cleared the way for Congress to collect millions of dollars from authors and artists for books published in countries outside the United States. At issue were Pablo Picasso works, novels by J.R.R. Tolkien and other works from authors and artists that had once been in the free-access "public domain." The high court said Wednesday the reach of the Constitution's "Progress Clause" does not extend to inventions that once were part of the public domain but now are no longer in copyright. "The compact the authors and printers made upon behalf of the American people at the inception of the Republic forecloses any claim that the contract is enforceable if it involves unpublished or unperformed original works," Chief Justice John Roberts wrote for the majority. "No law may restrain the release of any unpublished or unperformed original work in the public domain," Roberts said. Under U.S. copyright law, any "original, unpublished, uncopyrightable work that is the product of an artistic or scientific process made available to the public generally by publication ... will be considered to be in the public domain. Any lesser work" will be released into the public domain "at the discretion of the copyright owner." "Even where the process of copyright registration implies publication, the owner can remit the work's copyright to the public at the time of public releas," Roberts said. Writing for the dissenters, Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg, a judge on the Supreme Court since 1993, contended that the majority "conflates public-domain copying and the manufacture of original works of art by authors and artists abroad." She noted that the history of copyright laws is one of the "use of general public-domain works" to create new material in the public domain. "A claim to an original work arising from unregistered works in the public domain is not a conclusion, nor is it a fact, that the public domain has been 'utilized,' " Ginsburg wrote. In a separate dissent, Justice Antonin Scalia said the ruling would "severely impair the powers of Congress" to control the loss of "unique and original works" in the public domain. Writing for the six justices in the majority, Roberts suggested that a 2008 U.S. law granting copyright protection to works published after 1998 made it difficult for authors to avoid paying copyright for works published decades earlier. "According to today's opinion, a grant of copyright protection to an amended work, even before it is published, is sufficient to preserve copyright protection for a full 50 years," Roberts wrote. In February 2013, the 2nd U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals found that, under an "explicit but evolving line of federal support for international authors rights," Congress has the power to take works out of the public domain without paying the author. Roberts responded to that opinion in his opinion, saying the legislative history of the 1970 copyright act clearly articulates Congress' intent
A group of artists, film archivists, and educators sued after an international treaty signed by the United States restored copyright protection to thousands of once-royalty-free works originating in other countries. The plaintiffs made a free-speech argument, claiming the ruling would create an artistic vacuum, making a large body of songs and films out of their reach, if they had to pay fees. Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg, writing for the majority, downplayed such concerns. "Neither congressional practice nor our decisions treat the public domain, in any and all cases, as untouchable by copyright legislation," she said. Provisions in the law do "not unconstitutionally abridge speech." The plaintiffs were supported by the ACLU, Internet website giants like Google, and library groups. The big winners in the dispute are larger media and publishing companies, which hope this high court decision will now lead to greater reciprocal access to foreign markets for American books, music, films, television and other creative endeavors. Among the works in question were Pablo Picasso and M.C. Escher artwork, novels by Virginia Woolf and J.R.R. Tolkien, and music by Sergei Prokofiev, composer of "Peter and the Wolf"-- which is frequently performed in community orchestras. One of the original key plaintiffs was American musician Richard Kapp. He had created derivative recordings based on several compositions of the classic Russian composer Dmitri Shostakovich, but was later prevented from releasing them. Kapp died in 2006. "Libraries and digital repositories are using new technologies to make our cultural commons more accessible than ever, but they need a robust and stable public domain to be able to do that crucial work," said Julie Samuels, an attorney for the Electronic Frontier Foundation, which filed a brief supporting Kapp and others. The federal provision "has up-ended a basic tenet of copyright law: once a work enters the public domain, it stays in the public domain." The 1994 law in question was designed to put the United States in compliance with global treaties on intellectual property-- the Berne Convention and the so-called Uruguay Round. The federal legislation created copyrights to foreign works that had not previously been covered. The U.S. Copyright Office told the high court that millions of works would now receive copyright restoration. Public domain works can be freely reproduced, performed, downloaded and shared. "Congress determined that U.S. interests were best served by our full participation in the dominant system of international copyright protection," said Ginsburg. Justices Stephen Breyer and Samuel Alito dissented. "The (federal) statute has significant First Amendment costs," wrote Breyer. "... By withdrawing material from the public domain, the statute inhibits an important preexisting flow of information." Justice Elena Kagan did not participate in the case. She recused herself after earlier being involved in defending the law while serving as solicitor general in the Justice Department just before joining the high court in 2010. The case is Golan v. Holder (10-545).
During a week which saw Spurs fans question their manager, Sherwood made eight changes to his team to address one of the most glaring areas in football. Parker's loss has affected Tottenham chairman Daniel Levy Arsenal fans have mounted a relentless campaign to remove manager Arsene Wenger, who signed a new contract back in May. Spurs chairman Daniel Levy has also come under pressure after failing to qualify for the Champions League. Levy said he felt sorry for Arsene Wenger. "If I was him I would feel a bit sorry for you. I've got a difficult job," he told reporters Sunday. "We are Liverpool and we have to deliver -- we have to be in a Champions League position, otherwise it's absolutely disastrous for the club. We have to fight, we have to win games." Tottenham started the day just one point behind Chelsea in the Premier League and back in the Champions League. But Spurs could only draw their Europa League group when they defeated Feyenoord 2-1 on aggregate last month, leaving them outside the top four. Spurs played a young lineup Sunday and needed two early goals from Harry Kane before a Christian Benteke penalty and a header from Nathaniel Clyne broke the visitors' resistance in the second half. In a bright start to the game, Kane put Spurs ahead after just 36 seconds. Benteke cut in from the left to bring the ball into the area, fought his way through two tackles before firing home, only for Jan Vertonghen to head in a goal just before the break for Spurs. Liverpool keeps title hopes alive Still, Spurs recovered and needed Jermain Defoe's head to score an injury-time winner. The goal gave Tottenham a much-needed boost
Sherwood -- who replaced the axed Andre Villas Boas in December -- publicly criticized his team following a 4-0 reverse at Chelsea two weeks ago and Tottenham has since put in better performances, even if it lost to Arsenal last week and was bundled out of the Europa League. "You know what it took -- guts, character and spirit," Sherwood told Sky Sports. "They know how to dig deep now, they know how to respond, they know how to grind out a result and that's what they did today. "They know now that capitulations aren't acceptable. "It wasn't silky, it wasn't fantastic flowing football, but it was effective. We have quality players and when we fight and work for each other, then the quality players show what they can do." Southampton possesses quality players, too, with the English trio of Adam Lallana, Rickie Lambert and Jay Rodriguez all impressing this season and hoping to be on the plane to Brazil for the World Cup. Rodriguez's good finish after a Kyle Naughton mistake made it 1-0 in the 19th minute and the right back's error also led to Lambert setting up Lallana in the 28th. Christian Eriksen began the comeback in the 31st minute before adding a second in the 46th, just minutes after Sherwood's halftime talk. Sigurdsson, a substitute, settled the affair when it appeared as if the points would be shared. "We got a little speech at halftime and in the second half we were new guys," Eriksen told Sky. In Sunday's other game, Aston Villa -- which defeated Chelsea last week -- lost 4-1 at home to Stoke. Stoke leapfrogged Villa for 10th in the standings.
:George Clooney has been separated from his wife for two years, with an agreement being drawn up for the film star to give his ex-wife a 50 percent split of his estimated $300 million fortune, reported People . The 56-year-old actor and his former wife, former WWE wrestler Talia Balsam, announced their split in July 2013 following 13 years of marriage. "We are very sad to announce that George Clooney and Talia Balsam have separated," the pair said in a statement to People. "Their main concern remains the well-being of their children." It was also revealed last year that Balsam, 47, was having an affair. Balsam, who had an ex-husband and two young children while married to Clooney, was seen spending time with a "friend" and their 13-year-old son on multiple occasions, In Touch Weekly reported at the time. According to Us Weekly , George and Talia separated in March 2013, four months after Alamuddin appeared on the cover of Elle, which featured her as the January cover girl. Elle Editor-in-Chief Robbie Myers responded to the news of the split on Twitter, as she defended the magazine's choice to feature Alamuddin on the cover. Myers tweeted, "For the record: @amalalamuddin we love your dress, your glow, your smile--we love you just the way you are... and now thanks to you, a woman's right to make her own decisions about her body, beyond her marriage, has never been more important." @amalalamuddin Thank you for looking so damn gorgeous on our cover, without surgery or Photoshop! #notdying https://t.co/6pAHsJjP2j -- Robbie Myers (@RobbieYN) August 14, 2015 A representative for Clooney did not immediately respond to a request for comment from CNN.
But here is what we do know: . 1. She's a well-respected attorney. Alamuddin's profile on the site The Legal 500 says she "specialises in international law, human rights, criminal law and extradition." Some of her clients have included the Royal Court of Bahrain and WikiLeaks founder Julian Assange. "She is also part of the legal team representing the government of Cambodia in a case involving a territorial dispute with Thailand at the International Court of Justice in The Hague," the site says. "She has previously worked as a legal adviser to judges at the International Court of Justice and the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia, and as senior legal adviser to the prosecutor of the Special Tribunal for Lebanon." 2. Clooney isn't the only one who finds her attractive. She was named one of the 21 hottest female barristers in London on the blog "Your Barrister Boyfriend." The blog states: "Amal Alamuddin may make some feel inadequate because she has achieved the seemingly unattainable ideal of contemporary femininity: She is both breathtakingly beautiful and formidably successful." 3. She's a world traveler. In addition to being fluent in both Arabic and French, Alamuddin has traveled widely. Her time in the United States included graduating from the New York University School of Law, and among her trips is a safari to Tanzania she reportedly took with Clooney in March. 4. She's discreet. Alamuddin, 36, hasn't been speaking out about her relationship with the 53-year-old star. She has not given extensive interviews and People magazine reported on their wedding based on brief comments from Clooney and guests at the ceremony.
Outside the Capitol, local residents and tourists ogle familiar sites from the upper and lower galleries -- the Lincoln Memorial, the Washington Monument, the Air and Space Museum, and Independence Hall. Congressional staffers are rushing to tidy up the still-swimming Capitol ahead of their trip home. Back inside, members are getting out of the noonday heat and approaching the packed House chamber. While they are feeling the sting of fatigue and having less time for reflection after a grueling four-year campaign, the members are going through a party. All the while, they've left little to no doubt that they don't fully want to be there. Members skip speeches in favor of old clips from political junkie cable networks and statements of their principles. While President-elect Donald Trump made his mark with his outsider campaign, members of Congress seemed to spend more time on their own. While Trump thrived on headlines, senators and representatives took to their TV screens frequently, sometimes twice a day, during breaks from their daily votes. At times, the separation between the two political masters was so strong that some members wondered if Trump hadn't influenced their votes. While some members of Congress have seized the opportunity to speak about national security on the Senate floor or joined Senate Foreign Relations Committee hearings, others found their testimony as boring as they possibly could have hoped. Republican senators actively debated during final votes whether they could vote on ISIS defense funds, something the GOP overwhelmingly opposed, or whether they could urge the Pentagon to boost military spending. The debate -- over ISIS defense funding and the Pentagon -- was the order of the day for almost the entire week. Sen. Bob Corker (R-Tenn.), the newly-minted Senate Foreign Relations Committee chairman, repeatedly said that vote on ISIS funding was not enough. Corker and Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell were confident that they could cut a deal with the House to pass funding for the Defense Department. Pentagon leaders wanted a separate bill to address their challenges on ISIS even more. A Pentagon official said the Trump administration has been receptive to the wishes for a separate bill. Corker even had the support of Democrats and women's rights supporters, according to a Senate aide, who said Tuesday that he was open to working out a deal. Still, Corker said he did not think the House and Senate should both be tackling the issue. Defense Department Secretary Ash Carter, speaking at the Pentagon Tuesday, seemed to compliment members on their work on ISIS funding. Carter said the defense bill and the stopgap budget would "stabilize our military." "The House and Senate have engaged in robust discussions this week," Carter said. "They've conducted work to advance a number of issues within the bill." Carter added that he was encouraged that senators were taking time to focus on global issues like Somalia, Iraq, Syria, Afghanistan and Pakistan, saying "the Senate should focus on our national security challenges by voting on the House-passed defense policy bill." But Tennessee Republican Sen. Lamar Alexander, chairman of the Senate Budget Committee, was not pleased with the House-passed defense policy bill. "I think the House HAS PASSED a bill that is unacceptably limited in its defense strategy," Alexander said on the Senate floor Wednesday. "It needs to be replaced." Any lengthy debate on ISIS funding was curtailed as the chamber voted to pass a government spending bill. However, Alexander wasn't
But this time the race for a six-week respite feels different. There is bipartisan consensus that the United States is now at war with ISIS and that Congress should be a part of the decision-making process on how to deal with that, by passing a new authorization for military force. Bill Clinton: U.S. has proven it can't win an Iraq land war without Iraqis . But Congress took off to go campaign full time to try to keep their jobs rather than staying to do their jobs. "There is broad agreement in the country that this ISIS group is a threat," Rep. Chaka Fattah, D-Pennsylvania, told CNN. "So why not stay and debate it and not go home if your constituents believe it's a threat?" we asked. "I don't disagree," Fattah replied. "I'm prepared to vote yes. So I'm not ducking any vote." "It's ridiculous," Rep. Jared Polis, D-Colorado, said a few minutes later. "As if there is not enough to do and it's not just the war issues, it's immigration reform, ENDA (Employment Nondiscrimination Act) -- it's a number of different bills that have been filed that have bipartisan support," Polis said. It is true that rank-and-file House members, especially those like Fattah and Polis who are in the minority party, don't have much choice but to follow the schedule leaders lay out. Still, as we weaved through the slew of waiting cars to talk to lawmakers before they left, it was striking -- but not surprising -- the way blame was tossed around. Republicans blamed the Democrat-controlled Senate. "The problem is that we have a do-nothing Senate," Sen. Ted Cruz, R-Texas, said. Republicans also blamed the president. Rep. Richard Hudson, R-North Carolina, said he'd be glad to vote for a new use-of-force authorization against ISIS. "I wish the President would ask for one," Hudson said. Obama: ISIS threat against U.S., allies 'doesn't frighten us' Democrats noted that leaving now has become a tradition to help the House, where Republicans are a majority. "The House of Representatives runs every two years, and for many, many years the House has adjourned for the month of October." Democratic Sen. Claire McCaskill of Missouri said. Some senators were openly appalled that colleagues were heading home. Freshman Sen. Deb Fischer, R-Nebraska, had publicly urged her colleagues to stay, to no avail. "We need to be here we need to debate this issue," Fischer told us. Sen. Susan Collins, R-Maine, is on the ballot in November, but hers is a safe seat. Going home to campaign is not her first priority. "My job is to be in the Capitol working for the people of Maine and the American people and that's where I think we all belong now," said Collins, standing in the Capitol parking lot, pointing to the dome. Sen. Lindsey Graham, R-South Carolina, who won his big primary fight earlier this year and should face an easy reelection in November, had a trademark pithy synopsis. "We seem to be more worried about who runs the place than how the place runs," he said. Ultimately, all the lawmakers who complained and called it important to stay got in their cars and left, too. There's no reason to stay -- there are no more votes until after the election. Fresh act: 87-year-old felon Edwin Edwards wants back in. CNN's Adam P. Levy contributed to this report.
The international community has moved fast to send relief and recovery aid after Typhoon Haiyan pummeled the Philippines on Friday.On Monday, at least 48 search and rescue missions were still underway, including search and rescue and medical operations. That means there are still more than 3,000 people still missing in the storm's wake.The government is trying to manage its resources as the country buries the lives and property of more than 7,000 who died and thousands of others who were injured.Nearly five million people were affected, the Philippine Department of Social Welfare and Development said.Of those, about a quarter of a million people have been displaced.Another 50,000 people need shelter, said Benito Ramos, national disaster response chief.The situation is becoming more manageable, but it isn't getting better, local Gov. Manuel Roxas said.People are slowly being allowed to return to their damaged homes, but in limited areas, Ramos said. Residents of some areas still can't even get back to their water supply.The Philippines is still counting the dead, a large number of them buried in mass graves. Tacloban and three other cities bore the brunt of the storm.The death toll -- as of late Monday -- hasn't changed much since late Sunday, when the government revised its initial count of 2,275 dead, down from 2,350, to make the number provisional.At the donor conference for the Philippines on Monday, U.N. officials offered words of hope for the victims."The main challenge is still helping more people quickly," U.N. Undersecretary-General for Humanitarian Affairs Valerie Amos said. "Although the emergency is over, millions of survivors face an arduous recovery effort to restore basic services and rebuild their lives."The briefing concluded with a dire warning about the country's long-term need for reconstruction and longer-term rehabilitation.Damage to infrastructure and poverty level were on people's minds."I have a lot of friends and family in Tacloban," Philippine Interior Secretary Mar Roxas said. "There's not many words to describe what happened. I have never seen a disaster of this magnitude."While the international community has moved quickly to send relief and recovery aid, the government has been less able to get on top of the situation.Thousands of houses were destroyed and roads, bridges and other infrastructure were damaged.The government and international community face an ongoing and daunting task to provide relief to millions of people displaced from their homes. The death toll could grow even higher."Our job in the days ahead is to rebuild shattered communities, heal physical and emotional wounds, and prevent the climate of fear and hatred that accompanies calamities such as this one from taking root," Ramos said."In this respect, more more is required," he said.
A week after Typhoon Haiyan tore through the Philippines, the adrenaline-fueled response to the storm and its aftermath have faded from the streets of Tacloban. Now, the grim realities of daily life have taken its place. Juvelyn Taniega is trying to keep busy. She's collected old dishes and is cleaning them up, crouching on the ground near the spot where her home once stood and the place where she last saw her husband and six children alive. She's found the bodies of three of her children, but three of them are still missing. In days, she said, no one has come to help. "My children are decomposing," she said. In other parts of the storm-ravaged city, help has arrived. Trucks carry food. Crews clean up debris. Workers line up bodies to be identified by families who've been searching for their loved ones. Humanitarian workers and military troops from around the world have converged on the Eastern Philippines, racing against time to rescue and feed those devastated by the storm. The horror is everywhere thanks to what was Super Typhoon Haiyan when it came ashore a week ago ago, packing winds 3.5 times as strong as Hurricane Katrina, pushing in a wall of water 15 feet high and washing away towns on many islands. The official nationwide death toll from the typhoon had increased to 2,360 by Friday morning. Other reports suggested the toll could be far higher, with thousands feared dead in Tacloban alone. The deadly storm left more than 3,850 injured and at least 77 people reported missing across the Philippines, officials said. Reaching all the victims and assisting the survivors -- including more than 2 million people in need of food, according to the Philippines government -- are both priorities now. How to help . A significant sign of stepped up relief efforts was Thursday's arrival of the USS George Washington, an aircraft carrier teeming with 5,500 crew. It's accompanied by eight more ships that, together, have 80 aircraft -- including 21 helicopters -- that can deliver supplies to hard-to-reach areas and conduct search-and-rescue missions for those still holding on six days after the epic storm. Faces of the storm . Supplies running out at hospitals . In Tacloban, the bloated corpses of dogs lie next to body bags filled with human remains. The stench from wreckage hovers all around, as people sift through debris. A line snakes around the airport, filled with those eager to leave. Families huddle inside the city convention center, savoring their first rice in a week but not knowing when their next meal will come. "We really don't know what we're going to do next," said 30-year-old May May Gula, 30,
"And for the next two weeks, it became a source of astonishment. I learned all about it, I was overwhelmed by all the potential for artistic potential of this place," he says. Nominated for a PEN/Allen Foundation Creative Writing Award , Beaurain has created GIFs of Monrovia in Liberia -- depicting its traffic chaos, interaction between children and animals, scenes of conflict and people dancing at markets. He conceived the idea on Reddit as an alternative to hyper-realist photojournalism . One-year-old Alexandre is born in Paris, and his parents will decide where he lives after he is born. The Paris-based 31-year-old's photographic exploration is part of his project "Monrovia, Paris/Autour de Minuit/Monrovia" -- an immersive show of photographs and GIFs, taken over five months, which opened last week at the Centre Pierre Michel Jacob in Paris. Viewers can see Monrovia, plus images from Paris and Monrovia, in the interactive installation.
The search results did not paint a pretty picture of the country: images that popped up were mainly of civil war, blood diamonds, and child soldiers. "It looks like a nightmare, like hell on earth. It's a very bad marketing job," says Beaurain. When he arrived, he admits he was "not scared, but worried," though he soon found the city was a much friendlier place than Google let on. "I quickly realized it's really rather nice," he says. "It's one of the safest countries in Africa. There's a big discrepancy between what is really the country and its image internationally." Addressing this disparity, Beaurain launched Monrovia Animated, a series of GIFs that aims to capture the city's lighter side. Though the settings in some of these looped animations show the scars of Liberia's civil war (the once five-star Ducor Intercontinental Hotel, which today stands empty, is a regular backdrop), Beaurain's films also feature smiling, upbeat locals. "I don't always have
It may not be time to stop selling Egg McMuffins, but franchise owner in Bangkok, Thailand used simple common sense to distance themselves from McDonald's after winning a trademark dispute. David "McCurry" Menon said the "Mc" in his trademark looks too close to a McDonald's emblem. He allegedly bought a restaurant in 2010 with a white sign with the "Mc" in red-marker, but after the original sign was taken down Menon wanted to "distinguish" his restaurant from the McDonald's in the same shopping mall. "What McDonald's does in advertising is in line with what they are, and I want to distinguish that. So I kept the McCurry name for my business, but in that same area McDonald's had that 'Mc' thing everywhere," P. Suppiah, the father of the owner of the McCurry brand, told The Daily Telegraph . "When I applied for a trademark on McCurry, McDonald's was sued over McCurry... I believe this is not a good reason to stop people having a name like McCurry." Suppiah had opened his first franchise in 2006, before gaining legal clearance to trademark the "Mc" a year later in 2012. He didn't mind the legal fight, but he was nonetheless puzzled by McDonald's claim he was copying the fast food giant with his use of a "Mc" in red marker to identify his sign.
S.P Suppiah and his wife Kanageswary Suppiah. In a David-and-Goliath match-up in the world of fast food, McCurry -- a small Indian curry shop in Malaysia -- has won an eight-year legal battle against the hamburger giant. McDonald's claimed that the prefix "Mc" in McCurry trampled on its trademark. The country's Federal Court on Tuesday ruled that it didn't. "We're very relieved -- much, much relieved -- that this eight-year-old saga is finally over," said McCurry owner P. Suppiah. "We're a typical South Asian-Malay cuisine. No way people walking into McCurry can confuse us with McDonald's." The sparse 24/7 self-service restaurant in the capital, Kuala Lumpur, is popular with blue-collar workers who are drawn to its affordable fare, such as biryani rice and fishhead curry. Its logo: a chicken flashing a thumbs-up. The eatery opened in 1999. McDonald's filed suit two years later. "We were shocked that such a big giant wants to take us to court," Suppiah said. "We felt that we had nothing in common, because we were not selling any Western fast food." The hamburger chain, which has 185 restaurants throughout Malaysia, said McCurry was violating the prefix "Mc" and that McDonald's had the right to protect it. McCurry, in turn, said the prefix is common and is part of last names all across Europe.
We asked male readers and presented them with a list of outstanding women at the top of 2014. Here's what you had to say... Exercising courage and risk - for which they won an award. Phyllis Frost will be amazed and humbled to have been nominated by readers and nominated by CNN international journalists for CNN's Women of the Year special. Phyllis, 92, is the oldest female veteran of the 1940 air raid defence staff and is a dauntless fighter pilot, dog-fighting with the Germans over the skies of London during World War II. The Londoner is also one of the last living resistance fighters from the "Arctic Resistance" group during the First World War, and was a pioneer of sport at the Paralympic Games in 2012. In 2014, one of her comrades gave the silver medal to Phyllis at the Paralympics. You nominated Phyllis, saying: "Phyllis is an example of 'extreme health'. We can only hope for a whole generation of ladies and men to look at her and become their equal." The Daily Mail also recently featured Phyllis in a special "Throwback Thursday" Instagram post. AlertMe
After surviving a shot in the head by Taliban gunmen, Yousafzi has fought for the rights of girls to an education, become a leading spokesperson for women's rights, and is setting an example for women and girls around the globe. The topic of feminism was brought back into conversation by actress Emma Watson who also became the UN Women Goodwill Ambassador and called on women and men alike to reclaim "feminism" to benefit all. 2014 Oscar-winner Lupita N'yongo's role in "12 Years a Slave" brought her firmly into the limelight in which she now sits comfortably as both a style icon and role model. These three, are just a few of the women who have excelled in 2014 and as the year draws to a close, we want to know who else deserves to be hailed for their accomplishments over the past year. We want women spanning a range of professions to be recognized from science and technology, to fashion, politics, sport, medicine and the arts. Do you know a rising star in your field? Has someone in the public eye this year impressed you? Let us know in the comments box below.
What do Charlie Brown, Peyton Manning and Barack Obama have in common? You might say they each had fans that suffered from short memories. Recommended Slideshows 35 Pictures All of these celebrities have had their nudes leaked 35 Pictures 24 Pictures PHOTOS: Apple Emoji update includes a llama, skateboard and some bagel drama 24 Pictures 21 Pictures Here's what it's like to fish for your dinner at Zauo NYC (photos) 21 Pictures More picture galleries 14 Pictures PHOTOS: Nightmare Machine, the haunted house for millennials 14 Pictures 19 Pictures UPDATE: What you need to know about MTV's 'How Far Is Tattoo Far?' 19 Pictures 6 Pictures Is Cardi B pregnant again? This tweet has people guessing 6 Pictures In sports, Manning was wrong, and in sports journalism, Manning was right, based on the desire to believe that Peyton never, ever loses, just barely, in a terrible, bitter playoff game. For a president, Obama decided that when his record is rocky — and some times it has been — he is entitled to special treatment. This is ridiculous. How can this be? How can anybody, anyone, believe that the president of the United States never wanted to deport anyone, no matter how much they behave badly? How can they believe that? Some said that this was Obama's fundraising fantasy. When Obama claimed that all these deportations wouldn't happen, the White House had to correct its record. The truth was that the executive actions wouldn't change much. Still, a separate White House briefing acknowledged that about 800,000 undocumented immigrants under 31 in recent years would gain a reprieve from deportation. This is all good for the president. He would say that he had done something for the young undocumented immigrants who had been the most organized and vocal opponents of his presidency. After all, when you have a bully pulpit that was normally unbridled, you should use it often. Of course, it wasn't enough to help Hispanic Americans feel like things are better. Obama had to help himself. To help curry favor with Democrats running for the White House in 2016, he had to throw away his record and help a political candidate who just happens to be Latino. The administration says that several hundred thousand people are eligible. Many of those eligible would still be prosecuted. Obama asked Congress for additional funds to pursue criminal charges against the undocumented immigrants still, they say, in the country. The idea is that they still could be deported. What happened to responsible governance? This is a stunt to help improve Obama's chance with Latino voters, who are highly prized by candidates for president. It's a hope and a prayer that the Latino community will forgive Obama. There is no evidence that Obama will lose many supporters over this. A Gallup poll says Obama won 47 percent of the Hispanic vote in 2012, up from the 39 percent he won in 2008. It's not about the Latino vote anymore. The numbers that matter are in the other direction. African-Americans are not particularly interested in immigration policy, and Democrats aren't too interested in the issue either. So they don't mind that Obama's immigration record has been pretty bad. Where I don't understand is why they are willing to overlook that the Democratic ticket in 2016 is going to be led by an African-American president and a Hispanic vice president who know nothing about immigration policy? My guess is that the Latino community will come around. Until they don't. When everyone’s willing to overlook the past, it's a sign that things have gotten worse.
That's how it is with many Latinos and other immigration reform advocates. They want President Obama to become the person they voted for -- who promised Latinos that he would fix a broken immigration system, stop dividing families, and push through Congress a Dream Act-like legislation that would give undocumented young people a pathway to legal status if they go to college or join the military. None of that happened, and so Latinos -- who, in 2008, voted overwhelmingly for Obama -- are ambivalent about the president's re-election. Something had to be done to convince Latinos that the president is on their side. Today, something was done. Or rather, something was promised. The Obama administration announced that it would stop deporting younger illegal immigrants who came to the United States as children -- provided they meet certain conditions -- and begin granting work permits to them. Illegal immigrants will supposedly benefit from the new policy if they were brought to the United States before they turned 16, if they are 30 or younger, if they have lived in the country for at least five years, if they have no criminal record and if they attend or graduated from a U.S. high school, or have served in the military. The policy change could affect as many as 800,000 immigrants -- so-called DREAM'ers -- who would have benefited from the DREAM Act had it not been blocked by Congress. These people have been living in fear of being deported by the same administration that is now offering the pardon. Confused? Just wait. It gets better. We've only just begun to make our way down this rabbit hole. The administration is obviously trying to "checkmate" a nearly identical proposal floated by Republican Sen. Marco Rubio of Florida, which reportedly would also stop DREAM'ers from being deported and issue them work permits. The Rubio plan would not offer a pathway to citizenship. About this omission, the left was incensed. But Obama isn't offering a pathway to citizenship either, and yet many in the left couldn't be happier. Where is the consistency? Then there is the inconvenient fact that we're not supposed to even need this kind of policy change because, according to Obama, his administration isn't deporting DREAM'ers at all; instead, it's concentrating its enforcement efforts on criminals. That's exactly what Obama told Univision anchor Jorge Ramos during a March 2011 trip to El Salvador. A couple of weeks later, Obama had to swallow those words when -- during an education town hall meeting in Washington, sponsored by Univision -- he was confronted by a DREAM'er holding deportation papers. So now we're supposed to applaud the administration for not deporting people the president had claimed weren't being deported in the first place. Of course, the administration is deporting DREAM'ers, along with gardeners, housekeepers, nannies and ice cream vendors who represent no threat to public safety. It's a waste of time for officials to deny that. Just this week, I wrote in my CNN.com column about another one of Obama's broken promises. The administration pledged to use prosecutorial discretion to free from deportation proceedings individuals who had been in the country for a number of years, had U.S.-born children, or were otherwise rooted in the United States. That included DREAM'ers. So far, the promise hasn't amounted to much of anything. I expect a similar outcome with DREAM'ers. Some of them may benefit from Obama's new initiative, but many probably won't. That's because the idea behind the DREAM Act -- trading legal status for college attendance or military service -- is still unpopular with most voters in this country.